<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR881129-0032 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.11-29-88.f2.A1031</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 229 / Tuesday, November 29, 1988/ Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF LABOR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Occupational Safety and Health Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">29 CFR Part 1915</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. S-050]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Explosive and Other Dangerous Atmospheres in Vessels and Vessel Sections</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA)proposes to revise the shipyard employment safety standards addressingexplosive and other dangerous atmospheres. The standards proposed for revisionregulate safe entry and work carried on in confined spaces on board vesselsin shipyards.The existing shipyard employment standards (29 CFR Part 1915) apply toshipbuilding, ship repairing, and shipbreaking operations and related employments.However, the standards must be supplemented by the general industry standards(29 CFR Part 1910) as necessary to provide complete coverage for shipbuilding,ship repairing, and shipbreaking operations, and as necessary to providecomplete coverage for employees performing work not specifically addressedby the shipyard employment standards, or who are performing work in areasof shipyards not specifically addressed by the shipyard employment standards.This proposed action would update the shipyard employment standards coveringwork in explosive and other dangerous atmospheres in vessels and vesselsections and would reference applicable general industry standards, suchas Subpart S_Electrical, resulting in a single, comprehensive Part 1915,Subpart B, that would apply to all vessels and vessel sections in ship-yards(except construction activities covered by Part 1926).In addition, the proposed provisions are intended to correct problems foundin the existing standards which regulate in detail the specific methodsand materials to be used to reduce employee exposure to the hazards ofentering confined spaces on vessels. The proposed revisions would continueto address the hazards to which employees are exposed, but would do soby deleting many existing specification-type provisions which currentlylimit employer innovation, and by using performance-oriented provisionsas appropriate.The proposed revision provides conditions for safe entry into confinedspaces on vessels; stipulates the safety requirements for performing bothcold and hot work in these spaces; regulates the maintenance of safe conditionsduring occupancy and work; mandates the use of NFPA certified Marine Chemistsand Shipyard Competent Persons (SCP) to determine when confined spacesare safe for personnel and work; and requires labeling of unsafe spacesand logging of all test results.This revised document would raise OSHA standards to the level of existingmaritime industry consensus standards, thus precipitating several changesin existing federal regulations. The oxygen content required for unprotectedconfined space entry would be increased from 16.5 percent by volume to19.5 percent by volume. The sequence of testing would be rearranged toreflect actual practice so that oxygen, flammability and toxicity are testedin that order. Skilled personnel would be required to test the ships' compartmentsprior to human occupancy and starting work. The conditions for safely performinghot work in confined spaces would also be delineated. Duplicative paperworkrequirements would be eliminated. A non-mandatory appendix has been addedto provide additional educational information not suitable for regulation,but useful for employers and employees in understanding the hazards associatedwith work in confined spaces. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Comments on this proposed rulemaking must be postmarkedby February 27, 1989. Hearing requests must be postmarked by February 27,1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Written comments and requests for a hearing should besent in quadruplicate to the Docket Officer, Docket No. S-050, U.S. Departmentof Labor, Room N-2634, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210;(202) 523-7894.Written comments and hearing requests received will be available for inspectionand copying in Room N-2634, at the above address, from 8:15 a.m. to 4:45p.m., Monday through Friday.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Mr. James Foster, Office of Informationand Consumer Affairs, Occupational Safety and Health Administration, U.S.Department of Labor, Room N-3647, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington,DC 20210, Telephone: (202) 523-8151.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The principal author of this Noticeof Proposed Rulemaking is Susan Troiano Herbert, Office of Maritime SafetyStandards, Occupational Safety and Health Administration.<ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>In May 1971, the Occupational Safety and Health Administration, under authoritygranted by section 6(a) of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970(84 Stat. 1590, 29 U.S.C. 655(a)), adopted established Federal standardsissued under section 41 of the Longshore and Harbor Workers' CompensationAct (44 Stat. 1444, as amended; 33 U.S.C. 941), as standards applicableto ship repairing (29 CFR Part 1915), shipbuilding (29 CFR Part 1916),and shipbreaking (29 CFR Part 1917) operations. In addition, other Federalstandards and national consensus standards were similarly adopted as generalindustry standards (29 CFR Part 1910) and were made applicable to all aspectsof shipyard operations not specifically covered by Parts 1915, 1916, 1917,and the construction safety and health standards (Part 1926). On April20, 1982, the ship repairing, shipbuilding, and shipbreaking standardswere consolidated into one Part 1915 of Title 29 Code of Federal Regulations,and titled ``Occupational Safety and Health Standards for Shipyard Employment.''This consolidation eliminated duplicate and overlapping provisions withinthe former three parts but did not alter any substantive requirements.The consolidation had no effect on the applicability of the general industrystandards, 29 CFR Part 1910, to hazards or conditions in shipyard employmentsnot specifically addressed in the consolidated standard (see 29 CFR 1910.5(c)).In 1982, the shipyard industry, represented by the Shipbuilders Councilof America (SCA) and the American Waterways Shipyard Conference, requestedthat OSHA identify and consolidate the specific applicable provisions ofthe general industry standards into one composite set of shipyard employmentstandards.This second consolidation project would help shipyard employers by providingthem with a single set of shipyard standards and would eliminate subjectiveinterpretations as to the applicability of Part 1910 provisions. By eliminatingthe possibility that individuals within the shipyard industry would interpretPart 1910 applicability in different ways, fair and equal notice wouldbe given to all shipyard employers and employees of the rules for shipyardemployment safety.This second consolidation effort will incorporate into the existing internalorganization of Part 1915 applicable Part 1910 provisions relating to workin shipyards. This formatting approach utilizes an organizational formatwhich is already familiar to present users of the shipyard standards, andwhich provides for a logical grouping of related provisions based on thetype of work activity, hazard, or equipment involved. However, when a regroupingof topics would facilitate understanding of the rules, or when applicablePart 1910 provisions have no counterpart in the existing Part 1915 structure,then new subparts and subpart headings would be created. This new formattingwould not, in and of itself, create nor delete any obligations or duties.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Summary and Explanation of the Proposal</ITAG>The subject of work in explosive and other dangerous atmospheres in vesselsand vessel sections is currently covered by 29 CFR Part 1915, Subpart B_Explosiveand Other Dangerous Atmospheres; by 29 CFR Part 1910, Subpart S_Electricaland by parts of 29 CFR Part 1910, Subpart Z_Toxic and Hazardous Substances.The standards proposed in this document are intended to reference the applicablePart 1910 provisions into Part 1915, Subpart B; to remove or revise unnecessaryprovisions; to clarify existing language; and to update the standards toreflect current industry practice and relevant consensus standards. Inaddition, specification requirements are changed to performance requirementswhere it is recognized that there is more than one way to comply with aprovision. Finally, the competent person definition in Subpart A, coveringSubparts B, C, D, and H, has been revised.This standard covers vessels and vessel sections only. Existing Part 1910regulations that apply to entry into other enclosed spaces in shipyardshave not been incorporated into Subpart B. Instead, they will be incorporatedinto Part 1915 at a later date in a separate rulemaking for the reasonsmore fully elaborated below in the discussion of proposed andSection; 1915.11.A general discussion of all the proposed provisions follows: A reiterationof specific issues upon which OSHA solicits comment is located at the endof this section.Section 1915.7 Competent person.OSHA proposes to amend the requirements for, and the duties and skillsof, competent persons in shipyard employment. Currently, andSection; 1915.7of Subpart A defines a competent person for purposes of Subparts B, C,D, and H. As described more fully below, OSHA's proposed amendments wouldeliminate the paperwork burden involved in designating competent persons,would clarify the skills required by such persons, and would simplify therequirements regarding logging of inspections and tests.Section 1915.7, <T3>Competent person, </T3>describes the duties and skills of ``competentpersons,'' as applied to Subparts B, C, D, and H.Paragraph (a)(1) requires that at least one competent person be designatedby the employer, unless an NFPA certified Marine Chemist Coast Guard authorizedperson is always used. This requirement is unchanged from the existingrequirement found in andSection; 1915.7(a)(1).Paragraph (a)(2) would require a certification record containing the minimuminformation necessary to ensure that employers have designated a competentperson or always use a Marine Chemist. This requirement is different fromthe existing one found in andSection; 1915.7(a)(2). The existing requirementmandates that employers record this information on a government form OSHA73 and send it to OSHA. The OSHA Form 73 contains information that OSHAnow considers irrelevant. By minimizing the amount of information requestedand eliminating the transmittal requirement, OSHA proposes to reduce theunnecessary paperwork burden on employers. Public comment is requestedin Issue 14.Paragraph (b) covers the criteria employers must use when selecting thosepersons to do competent person tasks.Paragraph (b)(1) requires that the competent person understand the certificateissued by the Marine Chemist or the Coast Guard authorized person. Thisis unchanged from the existing requirement contained in andSection; 1915.7(b)(1).Paragraph (b)(2) requires that the competent person have the ability tocarry out written instructions left by the Marine Chemist, Coast Guardauthorized person or Certified Industrial Hygienists. The existing requirement,andSection; 1915.7(b)(1), requires him or her to carry out all written andoral instructions. All instructions must be clearly written down to reducethe possibility of not following instructions. Serious accidents couldresult if instructions are not followed or are misunderstood. Paragraph (b)(3) requires that competent persons know how to calibratecorrectly, and how to use and interpret testing equipment used to conductthe tests required in Subparts B, C, D and H of this part such as flammabilitytests, oxygen deficiency tests, carbon monoxide tests and follow up toxicitytesting. The existing rule, andSection; 1915.7(b)(2), requires that competentpersons know how to use a combustible gas indicator, oxygen indicator,carbon monoxide and carbon dioxide indicators. OSHA believes that the proposedperformance language is better suited for regulating the wide variety oftest equipment that might be used by competent persons. The proposed standardrecognizes there may be one or several appropriate pieces of test equipmentneeded to test atmospheres, but does not specify nor limit which ones mustbe used. The proposed standard recognizes that some of the test equipmentthat will be needed will be toxicity test equipment used to determine ifconditions are being maintained as they were originally found. In sucha situation, the competent person will have to conduct follow up toxicitytesting using instructions left by a Marine Chemist, Coast Guard authorizedperson, or industrial hygienist. In addition, the proposed standard requiresthat the competent person know how to calibrate the test instrument. Theexisting standard does not require this; it assumes that the competentperson will know how to calibrate correctly, since calibration is an essentialpart of correct meter usage. This requirement has been included to stressits importance. Paragraph (b)(4) requires an understanding and familiarity with SubpartsB, C, D and H of this part. Again, this requirement remains unchanged fromthe existing requirement, andSection; 1915.7(b)(3). Paragraph (b)(5) requires familiarity with the structure and knowledgeof the location and designation of spaces on vessels. It is unchanged fromthe existing requirement, andSection; 1915.7(b)(4). Paragraph (b)(6) requires that the competent person be capable of performingthe tests and inspections required by Subparts B, C, D and H of this part.This requirement is unchanged from the existing requirement, andSection;1915.7(b)(5). Paragraph (b)(7) requires that competent persons have the ability to enterthe appropriate information, for example, test results from meter readings,in the required log (OSHA 74). This requirement is the same as the existingrequirement, andSection; 1915.7(b)(5). Paragraph (c) covers logging of inspections and tests and contains therequirements to log all inspections and tests that are required by SubpartsB, C, D and H of this part. Paragraph (1) requires that all competent persons, certified industrialhygienist or Coast Guard authorized person tests required by Subparts B,C, D and H of this part, be recorded on the OSHA Form 74, ``Log of Inspectionsand Tests by Competent Persons.'' This requirement is the same as the existingone, andSection; 1915.7(c)(1). Paragraph (2) requires that employers require Marine Chemists to recordtheir test results and instructions. This requirement is the same as thatin existing andSection; 1915.7(c)(3). This proposed revision also eliminatesthe existing requirement found in andSection; 1915.12(b)(4), that MarineChemists complete an OSHA 74 in addition to a Marine Chemists certificate.OSHA believes that this requirement is an unnecessary duplicatio of paperwork.Therefore the requirement has been deleted that the Chemist or employercomplete the OSHA 74 in addition to a certificate. Marine Chemists willcomplete their own Marine Chemist certificate as required by NFPA 306.Paragraph (3) requires that a separate log be maintained for each vesseland vessel section where tests are done. This is the same as the existingrequirement, andSection; 1915.7(c)(1). Paragraph (4) requires that OSHA 74 logs or Marine Chemist's or Coast Guardauthorized person's certificates be available in the immediate vicinityof the work while the operations are progressing. This requirement is foundin the existing regulation, andSection; 1915.7(c)(2). Paragraph (5) requires that the OSHA 74 log and the Marine Chemist certificaterequired in andSection; 1915.7(c) (1) and (2) be kept for three months fromthe date of completion of the job. This requirement is unchanged from existingandSection; 1915.7 (c)(2) and (c)(3). Paragraph (d) provides some exceptional circumstances under which employersare permitted to designate a competent person who does not meet all thecriteria of paragraph (b). Employers are permitted to select the competentperson based on those criteria in proposed andSection; 1915.7(b) which areapplicable to the duties carried out. This section remains unchanged fromthe existing standard, andSection; 1915.7(d). <T3>Title.</T3> OSHA proposes to amend the title of Subpart B to indicateclearly that the subpart applies to vessels and vessel sections only. Thisis the scope of the present subpart. The title change ensures that theprovisions will not mistakenly be applied to other areas of the shipyardthat might involve explosive or other dangerous atmospheres. Section 1915.11 Scope, application and definitions applicable to this subpart.Paragraph (a) outlines the scope and application of Subpart B. The proposalwould apply to all vessels and vessel sections found in shipyards, andwould apply to shipbuilding, shipbreaking and ship repair. Section 1915.11of the existing standard specifies that andSection;andSection; 1915.12 through1915.15 apply only to ship repair and shipbreaking, while andSection; 1915.16applies only to ship repair. The following chart shows the requirementsand coverage of each section as they currently appear in Subpart B. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Scope and Coverage of Current Subpart B</T4><H1>Section</H1><H1>Requirements</H1><H1>Activity covered</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">1915.12<D>Provides requirements for safe entry</D><D>Shipbreaking, ship repairing.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D/>Space to be entered/Test needed<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Cargo spaces/for flammable/combustible atmosphere</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Cargo spaces, fumigated spaces/for toxics, corrosives, and irritants</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Sealed compartments, spaces coated and closed up/for oxygen deficiency</D><ITAG tagnum="1">1915.13<D>Provisions for safely cleaning spaces and doing other cold work; ventilationand ignition source requirements</D><D>Shipbreaking, ship repairing.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1915.14<D>Indicates spaces and locations that must be tested for flammable atmospheresprior to doing hot work</D><D>Shipbreaking, ship repairing.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1915.15<D>Requirements for maintaining atmospheric conditions in tanks and spacesonce work has started</D><D>Shipbreaking, ship repairing.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1915.16<D>Warning signs telling workers which tanks are not safe to enter andwhich tanks are not safe for hot work</D><D>Ship repairing.</D></ITAG></ITAG>The scope and applicability of the proposed standard differ from the existingstandard in two ways: (1) The proposed standard extends coverage to employeesin shipbuilding who are currently not protected by andSection;andSection; 1915.12-1915.16;(2) the proposed standard extends coverage to employees in ship-breakingwho are not protected by andSection; 1915.16. There are several reasons formaking these changes.(1) OSHA standards will be in agreement with the National Fire ProtectionAssociation's (NFPA) current standard concerning safe entry and work onmarine vessels during shipbuilding, shipbreaking and ship repair, <T3>NFPA 306 Control of Gas Hazards on Vessels </T3>(1938). NFPA 306 (1988)is the national consensus standard that is recognized as the self-regulatorydocument by the maritime industry. This consensus standard requires thatthe atmosphere in compartments on marine vessels be tested for oxygen deficiency,flammability, and toxicity prior to entry; that cold work be done safely;that the atmosphere in compartments on marine vessels be tested for flammabilityprior to hot work; and that conditions be maintained unchanged in the spacewhere work is being done. These requirements apply regardless of whethershipbuilding, shipbreaking or ship repairing is being done.NFPA 306 is an industry-wide consensus standard used to provide self-regulationfor work in explosive, toxic and oxygen deficient atmospheres. OSHA's proposalto expand coverage of Subpart B to shipbuilding, shipbreaking and shiprepairing would be in agreement with the existing national consensus standard.(2) Applying andSection;andSection; 1915.12-1915.16 to shipbuilding, breakingand repairing is current industry practice.Approximately 30 groups representing employers, unions, associations andgovernment agencies responded to OSHA's request for comments on the firstdraft rewrite of Subpart B. None objected to expanding coverage to shipbuilding,shipbreaking and ship repairing. OSHA believes that the primary reasonnone objected is that this change reflects current industry practice. Therefore,this proposed standard expands the scope to cover all building, breakingand repairing on vessels and vessel sections.As noted previously, the proposed Subpart B, like the current Subpart,applies to entry and work in vessel and vessel sections and not to enclosedor confined spaces found in other shipyard structures and buildings. Theproposed standard incorporates references to sections of Part 1910 whichare applicable to entry and work in vessel and vessel sections (such asSubpart S_Electrical).However, this standard does not incorporate or reference those sectionsof 29 CFR Part 1910 which address entry into and work in enclosed or confinedspace atmospheres found in other shipyard structures and buildings. Althoughthere are only a few regulations in 29 CFR Part 1910 that are applicableto confined spaces elsewhere in the shipyard (such as Subpart G_OccupationalHealth and Environmental Control, and in Subpart H_Hazardous Materials),these regulations will be incorporated in 29 CFR Part 1915 when those subpartsin which they are now included are incorporated. These Part 1910 standardscovering yards were not incorporated in the revision of Part 1915, SubpartB, because the existing treatment of confined spaces on vessels is morestringent than it is for the yards themselves. To combine these standardswould have resulted in confusion and an unnecessary increased burden foryard owners.The following chart outlines the major differences in the treatment ofconfined spaces between existing Part 1915 and 1910:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,xs50,xs50,r10</C> <H1>Subject</H1><H1>Part 1915</H1><H1>Part 1910 Subparts G, H andamp; Q</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Who conducts tests of atmospheres?<D>Marine chemist or shipyard competent person.</D><D>Not specified. References to this subject are found in andSection;andSection;1910.49(d)(11)(ii);1910.94(d)(11)(iv); 1910.106(e)(8).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">What is the maximum concentration of flammables permitted in the atmosphere?<D>10 percent of the lower flammable limit (LEL).</D><D>Not specified. References to this subject are found in andSection;andSection;1910.252(d)(2)(vi)(c);1910.94(d)(11)(iv).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Where does the standard currently apply?<D>Vessels and vessel sections.</D><D>Shipyards only.</D></ITAG></ITAG>Because of these substantive differences in requirements, 29 CFR Part 1915,Subpart B, will continue to cover only vessels and vessel sections. Itwill not cover those confined spaces located elsewhere in yards, whichwill continue to be covered by General Industry requirements for now. Futuresubpart revisions in the Part 1915 consolidation project will deal withspecific shipyard standards in this area. Paragraph (b) lists and defines the major words used in the proposed standard.Many of the definitions are the same ones found in existing Part 1915,but not specifically in Subpart B. Those which have been added to SubpartB have been taken from Subpart A or from consensus standards and have beenadded for the sake of clarity. The words defined in proposed Subpart Bfollow. Unless different definitions are listed in proposed Subpart B,the definitions found in Subpart A are still applicable. ``Adjacent compartments or spaces.'' This term is used to describe thosecompartments or spaces which border on the space where the work is to bedone; this term is also used to describe those spaces which are locatedon the diagonal from the space where the work is to be done. The existingrule provides no definition, but uses the term to describe those spacesor compartments which must be tested and cleaned prior to entry and hotwork. The proposed definition, adopted from NFPA 306, paragraphs 3-3.1.4and 3-3.3.3, reflects the meaning of the term as it is used in the maritimeindustry. The definition is added for clarity. ``Bulk.'' This term is used to describe materials that are transferredon or off the vessel via piping systems. The existing rule offers no definition,but uses the term to provide descriptive information regarding the compartmentsand tanks which must be tested (e.g., those that have carried flammableor combustible liquids or gases in bulk). The proposed definition is adoptedfrom Coast Guard regulations (49 CFR 1.46(t)), and reflects the meaningof the term as used in the maritime industry. The definition is added forclarity. ``Certified Industrial Hygienist.'' This term is used to mean an individualwho is certified by the American Board of Industrial Hygiene. ``Coast Guard authorized person.'' This term is used in the proposal torefer to that person who meets the requirements of 46 CFR 35.01-1(c)(1)for tank vessels; 46 CFR 71.60-1(c)(1) for passenger vessels; and 46 CFR91.50-1(c)(1) for cargo and miscellaneous vessels. The Coast Guard authorizedperson is one who, through the authority of the Officer in Charge of MarineInspection, can be designated to perform Marine Chemist functions whena Marine Chemist is not reasonably available. ``Competent Person.'' This term is used to refer to a shipyard competentperson who meets the criteria set forth in andSection; 1915.7 of this part.``Hot work.'' This term is used to define the different types of hot work,such as welding, riveting, burning, use of powder-actuated tools or similarfire producing operations, and to spell out those circumstances where suchwork is not classified as hot work for purposes of this subpart. The existingdefinition is located in two different sections of the standard, andSection;andSection;1915.4(r) and 1915.14(a). Those definitions are not in agreement with NFPA306 because they do not recognize circumstances under which hot work shouldnot be classified as such. The proposed definition combines the existinglanguage from andSection;andSection; 1915.4(r) and 1915.14(a) and the exceptionspermitted under NFPA 306-1988, andpara; 1.5, to provide a comprehensive definitionthat recognizes industry practices. Additionally, examples are providedof both hot work and circumstances under which hot work should not be classifiedas such. Those examples are located in Appendix A, which provides supplementalinformation to employers and employees to help them comply with this standard.``Immediately dangerous to life and health.'' This term is used to describean atmosphere that poses an immediate hazard to life or produces immediatedebilitating effects on health which is likely to result in death or irreversibleinjury. ``Inert or inerted atmosphere.'' This term is used to describe an atmosphereor environment that will not support combustion. The existing standarduses the term in andSection; 1915.14(d)(2) and provides a definition thatinforms employers what materials to use in inerting, i.e., nonflammablegas or water. Equally important, however, is the need to specify the amountof oxygen that must be removed or the water level necessary to work safelyin the space. This information is included in NFPA 306 andpara; 1-6.6, whichreflects standard industry practices. OSHA proposes to incorporate theoxygen and water levels identified as necessary by NFPA, for the OSHA definition.Public comment is solicited on the above subject in Issue Number 1. ``Lower explosive limit.'' This term describes the minimum concentrationof vapor in air below which propagation of a flame does not occur. ``Marine Chemist.'' This term describes a person who is certified by theNational Fire Protection Association (NFPA) in accordance with their ``Rulesfor Certification of Marine Chemists,'' establishing him or her as a personqualified to determine whether ship construction, alteration, repair ordemolition can be safely undertaken. Public comment is solicited on the above subject in Issue Number 2. ``Not Safe for Hot Work.'' This term is used to describe those compartmentswhich do not meet the minimum safety criteria necessary to permit the useof ignition sources. This phrase was not defined in the existing regulation,although, in a slightly modified fashion, it was used in andSection; 1915.16(a),i.e., ``Not Safe for Fire.'' The source of the proposed definition is NFPA306. By including a definition for this term, OSHA insures that the phraseas used is clearly understood. ``Not Safe for Workers.'' This term is used to describe those atmosphereswhich are not safe for unrestricted entry. The term can be used to describeeither of two situations which occur. In the first, the space is not safefor workers to enter unless personal protective equipment is worn or thelength of time of employee exposure is restricted. In the second, the spaceis not safe for entry <T3>under any circumstances, </T3>regardless of whether personal protectiveequipment is worn. An example of such a situation is OSHA's prohibitionregarding employee entry into toxic atmospheres above the IDLH level. Thereis no existing definition of this phrase provided, although it is usedin existing andSection; 1915.16(a) (e.g. ``Not Safe for Men''). The proposeddefinition has been adopted from NFPA 306; it will more clearly explainthose conditions which comprise unsafe entry. Public comment is requested in Issue Number 3 as to whether or not thedefinition of ``Not Safe for Workers'' should be revised to create a secondcategory of ``Safe with Restrictions.'' Public comment is requested inIssue Number 16 as to use of OSHA PEl's.``Oxygen-deficient atmosphere.'' This term is used to describe that volumeof oxygen below which respiratory protection must be provided. This requirementhas been changed from 16.5 percent oxygen by volume in andSection;1915.12(c)(1)to 19.5 percent oxygen by volume in this proposal. This change brings themaritime standard into agreement with OSHA's General Industry standards(andSection;1910.94(d)(11)(iii)) and NFPA 306, and reflects current industrypractice.``Oxygen-enriched atmosphere.'' This term is used to describe that volumeof oxygen above which it is unsafe to perform hot work. There is no definitionprovided in the existing standard. The figure of 22.0 percent by volumehas been selected since it is high enough to take meter error into consideration,but not so high that it is at a dangerous level. This is more fully discussedin andSection;1915.12(a)(2).``Safe for Hot Work.'' This term is used to describe those conditions thatmust occur in order for hot work to be done safely. The existing standarduses the term with minor modification (i.e., the existing standard uses``Safe for Fire''), but provides no definition. The source of the proposeddefinition is NFPA 306. Including this term in OSHA's definitions providesa clear understanding of the conditions that constitute a safe environmentfor hot work.``Safe for Workers.'' This term is used to describe those conditions requiredfor unrestricted, unprotected entry into a space. The existing OSHA standardused the term but did not clearly define it. OSHA proposes that ``Safefor Workers'' will mean that all of these conditions have been met: Theflammable atmosphere is less than 10 percent LEL; The toxic atmosphereis below the permissible exposure limits (PEL's) in 29 CFR Part 1910, SubpartZ; The residues are not capable of producing toxic concentrations abovethe permissible exposure limits; And there is at least 19.5 percent oxygenby volume in the space.The only differences between the existing usage and the proposed definitionis that the oxygen level required for safe entry has been raised from 16.5percent oxygen by volume to 19.5 percent oxygen by volume and the referenceto the 1970 American Conference of Governmental Industrial Hygienists thresholdlimit values has been changed to OSHA PEL's. This action brings the maritimestandards into line with OSHA's General Industry standards, NFPA 306, andcurrent industry practice.``Upper explosive limit.'' This term is used to describe the maximum concentrationof flammable vapor in air above which propagation of a flame does not occur.``Vessel section.'' This term is used to describe all sub-assemblies, modules,and other components of a vessel, including those that are not directlyattached to the vessel because of construction, repair, or breaking.``Weather deck.'' This term is used to refer to the uppermost continuousdeck that is exposed to the weather. The term is not defined in the existingstandard; it is proposed for inclusion in the revised standard to indicateclearly that portion of the vessel to which reference is made.Section 1915.12 Precautions before entering compartments or spaces.This section describes those spaces and types of atmospheres which mustbe tested prior to entry. In addition, this section provides numericallimits for atmospheric exposures, below or above which employees may notenter or may enter only with personal protective equipment. An employershould refer to andSection;1915.13 for information on doing cleaning andcold work safely, and to andSection;1915.14 for information on hot work.OSHA proposes to rearrange the current organization of andSection;1915.12.In the existing format, paragraph (a) covers testing of flammable atmospheres,paragraph (b) covers testing for toxic atmospheres, and paragraph (c) coverstesting for oxygen deficiency.Both Newport News and Harbor Testing Laboratory have commented that theexisting sequence implies that the tests be conducted in that order. Inactual practice, however, the first test conducted usually is for oxygen.This is because most combustible gas indicators in use today require sufficientoxygen for combustion in order to register an accurate combustible gasindicator reading. In other words, the tester cannot be assured of an accurateLEL reading without first determining the oxygen level. The proposed standard,therefore, covers oxygen deficiency testing first, flammability testingnext, and toxicity testing last.It must be emphasized, however, that neither the existing or proposed standard<T3>requires</T3> testing in any particular sequence. The list of teststo be conducted has been rearranged because it supports a logical testingsequence.Paragraph (a)(1) describes those compartments and spaces on vessels andvessel sections that must be checked for oxygen deficiency before employeesenter them. The specific descriptions are provided in andSection;andSection;1915.12(a)(1)(i)-(viii). The existing rule, andSection;1915.12(c)(1), provides thesame requirements for ship repair and ship breaking, but not for new construction.New construction has been added because the same hazards may exist as inrepair. This is especially true when paintings and coatings have been appliedto tanks during construction. In addition, it is current industry practiceto test the atmospheres in such cases.Paragraph (a)(2) provides that a shipyard competent person must conductthe test required for oxygen deficiency. This requirement is unchangedfrom the existing rule, andSection;1915.12(c)(1).Paragraph (a)(3) requires that the oxygen deficiency test be conductedprior to employees' initial entry into the space. This proposed requirementremains unchanged from the existing requirement, andSection;1915.12(c)(1).Public comment is requested in Issue Number 4 regarding the appropriateinterpretation of the words ``initial entry.''Paragraph (a)(4) proposes to require that employees wear appropriate respiratoryprotection when there is a risk of being overcome by an oxygen deficientatmosphere in accordance with Subpart I.The existing rule, andSection;1915.12(c)(1), requires that a space contain16.5 percent oxygen by volume before entry is allowed. A second existingrule, andSection;1915.12(c)(2), requires that any space with less than 16.5percent oxygen by volume must be ventilated to bring the oxygen level upto 16.5 percent by volume.There are two differences between the proposed rule and the two existingrules:(1) The proposed rule raises the oxygen level to 19.5 percent by volumefor unprotected entry into a space.(2) The proposed rule permits entry into spaces containing less than 19.5percent oxygen by volume provided respiratory protection is worn.The oxygen level has been increased from 16.5 percent oxygen by volumeto 19.5 percent oxygen by volume to be consistent with OSHA's General Industrystandard (specifically andSection;1910.94(d)(11)(iii)), the NFPA 306 standard,ANSI Z88.2-1980, and widespread industry practice.The existing rule, andSection;1915.12(c)(2), requiring that spaces be ventilatedif below 16.5 percent oxygen by volume, has been eliminated and entry isnow permitted with adequate respiratory protection into spaces below 19.5percent oxygen by volume. The existing rule, andSection;1915.12(c)(2), requiredthat spaces with oxygen below 16.5 percent must be ventilated to bringthe oxygen level up to 16.5 percent or greater for unprotected entry. Thepurpose of this rule was to ensure that routine work would occur in anatmosphere containing at least 16.5 percent oxygen by volume, <T3>and</T3> that routine work would <T3>not</T3> be done in an atmosphere containing less than 16.5 percentoxygen. However, there are times when work must occur in atmospheres withless than 16.5 percent oxygen, such as in emergencies and other work ofbrief duration (see andSection;1915.12(d)).In addition, there are times when a space must be inerted to do hot work.When inerted, the space would typically contain between 5 percent and 8percent oxygen by volume. Using the existing rule, andSection;1915.12(c)(2),the employer would be required to ventilate to bring the oxygen level upto 16.5 percent by volume, even though doing so would negate the purposeof inerting and create a flammable atmosphere. In other words, followingthe letter of the law of the existing rule could create a dangerous situation.Therefore, OSHA has changed this rule by dropping the requirement to ventilatea space that is below 16.5 percent oxygen in order to bring the oxygenlevel up to at least 16.5 percent. This action permits employees to enterspaces which have been inerted by reducing the oxygen content. At suchtimes, employees must wear respiratory protection as required in proposedandSection;1915.12(a)(4). These changes provide more protection than theexisting standard and provide the employer flexibility in achieving safeworking conditions. Employees will be provided adequate protection fromoxygen deficient atmospheres through the proper use of respirators.Public comment is requested in Issue Number 16, regarding the appropriatecontrol measures in oxygen deficient atmospheres.Paragraph (a)(5) is a new rule which requires employers to label thosespaces without at least 19.5 percent oxygen by volume as ``Not Safe forWorkers.'' This information is provided so that employers will know howto label spaces after the oxygen testing has been completed.Paragraph (b) covers ``flammable atmospheres'' during entry.Paragraph (b)(1) sets forth the spaces where atmospheres must be testedfor flammable vapors and gases prior to employee entry. Only those spaceswhich are listed in this paragraph <T3>and</T3> are to be entered must be tested. There is no change fromthe existing requirements covered in andSection;andSection;1915.12(a)(1), (a)(1)(i) and (ii).Paragraph (b)(2) requires that a competent person conduct the flammabilitytest. This requirement is unchanged from the existing requirement, andSection;1915.12(a)(1).Paragraph (b)(3) requires that the flammability test be conducted priorto employees' initial entry into the space. This requirement is unchangedfrom the existing provision, andSection;1915.12(a)(1). Public comment isrequested in Issue Number 4 regarding the appropriate interpretation of``initial entry.''Paragraph (b)(4) prohibits employees from entering a space if the concentrationof flammable vapors or gases is at or above 10 percent of the lower explosivelimit. The existing rule contains the same restrictions, but uses a lowerexplosive limit of greater than 10 percent. The difference is that theproposed rule uses ``at or above'' 10 percent and the existing rule uses``greater than'' 10 percent.In the existing regulations, there are several places in Subpart B whereLEL limits are given, but they are not in agreement with each other. Thischange, using the cutoff of ``at or above'' 10 percent of the LEL, is madeto provide consistency within the Subpart, and to clarify the cutoff point.NFPA 306 uses ``at or above'' 10 percent of the LEL as the cutoff.Paragraph (b)(5) is a new rule requiring that spaces be labeled ``Not SafeFor Workers'' when the concentration of vapor or gas is at or above 10percent of the lower explosive limit.Paragraph (b)(6) provides that when flammable substances are also listedin the PEL's, then the testing requirements and other provisions of andSection;1915.12(c),``Toxic atmospheres and residues,'' will apply. The existing provision,andSection;1915.12(a)(3), requires that employees receive respiratory protectionif exposed to a toxic flammable gas which is above the PEL but below thelevel immediately dangerous to life and health. If the substance is bothflammable and toxic, the proposed provision specifies that the requirementsgoverning employee entry into spaces that contain, or have contained, toxicswill apply in addition to the provisions protecting against fire and explosion.Paragraph (c)(1) sets forth provisions which describe those compartmentsand spaces which must be tested or inspected for toxic chemicals priorto entry. The existing rule and the proposed rule cover the same spaces.Paragraphs (c)(1)(i) and (ii) describe the tests and inspections that mustbe conducted on the spaces designated in andSection;1915.12(c)(1). This requirementis unchanged from the existing regulation, andSection;1915.12(b)(1).Paragraph (c)(2) requires that the atmospheric test for toxicity and thevisual inspection for toxic and corrosive residues be conducted by an NFPAcertified Marine Chemist, an Industrial Hygienist certified by the AmericanBoard of Industrial Hygiene (ABIH), or a Coast Guard Authorized Person.The existing regulation, andSection;1915.12(b)(1), states that the requiredtests and inspections shall be conducted by an NFPA Marine Chemist, anindustrial hygienist or other person qualified to make these tests. Thisproposal still requires that Marine Chemists be NFPA certified, but addsthe requirements that industrial hygienists be certified by ABIH and that``other qualified persons'' can only be Coast Guard authorized persons.OSHA had previously responded to a written request to define these threeterms_Marine Chemist, industrial hygienist, and other person qualified_bysupplying the definitions used in the proposed language of this standard.Public comment is requested on Issue Number 5 regarding OSHA's proposeddefinitions of ``certified industrial hygienist'' and ``other qualifiedperson.''Paragraph (c)(3) requiring that all tests and inspections be conductedprior to employees' initial entry remains unchanged from the existing requirementlocated in andSection;1915.12(b)(1).Public comment is requested in Issue Number 4 regarding the interpretationof ``initial entry.''Paragraph (c)(4) prohibits employees from entering spaces which have toxicatmospheres above the immediately dangerous to life or health (IDLH) level,and requires that such spaces be ventilated below the IDLH level if theyare to be entered at all. The proposed language also advises the readerof the exception to this requirement permitted by andSection;1915.12(d),regarding work of brief duration. There is no substantive difference betweenthe proposed standard and the existing requirements in andSection;1915.12(b)(2).Paragraph (c)(5) proposes that employees be provided with respiratory protectionwhen toxic contaminants are above the permissible exposure limit but belowthe IDLH levels. The existing standard, andSection;1915.12(b)(3) providesthe same protection (see andSection;1915.5). It should be noted that andSection;andSection;1910.1001-1910.1500will continue to apply to vessels and vessel sections.Paragraph (c)(6) proposes a new rule which indicates clearly that whentoxic concentrations are above the permissible exposure limits, the spacemust be labeled ``Not Safe for Workers.''Paragraph (d) proposes to permit work for brief periods of time or in emergenciesin atmospheres which are above the upper explosive limit or are otherwiseconsidered immediately dangerous to life or health. In addition, the standardprohibits all ignition sources in such atmospheres, requires that atmospheresthat are above the UEL be maintained above the UEL, and requires constantatmospheric monitoring when working in an atmosphere above the upper explosivelimit. The existing standard, andSection;1915.12(d), is the same as the proposedrevision except that the prohibition against ignition sources and the requirementfor atmospheric monitoring are not currently included but are proposedfor addition. Those two caveats have been added to the existing standardbecause that standard as written might permit unsafe work practices. Thethree restrictions will provide an added measure of safety. Dilution ofan atmosphere in the upper flammable range could bring it into the flammablerange. This could occur by simply opening a tank and allowing fresh airto mix with the tank's atmosphere. Prohibiting all ignition sources willminimize the possibility of a fire should the tank's atmosphere becomeflammable. Constant atmospheric monitoring will forewarn both the employerand the employees if, and when, the tank enters the flammable range.Public comment is requested in Issue Number 6 regarding work in atmospheresabove the upper flammable limit and atmospheres immediately dangerous tolife and health.The ``Note'' following andSection;1915.12(d) advises employers that SubpartI of 29 CFR Part 1915 carries additional requirements related to andSection;1915.12(d).Employees entering atmospheric conditions such as those described in thisparagraph must also wear personal protective equipment in accordance withSubpart I of Part 1915. It should be noted that OSHA has also proposedamending Subpart I in a separate rulemaking as part of the overall consolidationproject. Any changes to those regulations adopted by OSHA would be applicableto the work and activities covered by this section. Regarding work in UELand IDLH atmospheres, proposed Subpart I would continue to require thatemployees be protected from IDLH atmospheres by means of positive pressure,self-contained breathing apparatus or positive pressure airline respiratorswith an auxiliary self-contained supply of air for escape purposes. (Atmospheresabove the UEL may also be IDLH). Subpart I would also continue to requirethat employees wear protective clothing and gloves designed to protectthem from hazards of exposures to chemicals. In addition, Subpart I wouldcontinue to require that eye and face protection be provided to employeesexposed to liquid chemicals, chemical gases and vapors.The second part of the ``Note'' following andSection;1915.12(d) reminds employersthat emergency rescue provisions are required for work in IDLH atmospheres,and that these provisions are also in Subpart I. Newly proposed SubpartI would continue to require written procedures for safe respirator usein IDLH atmospheres; require that a fully equipped stand-by person mustbe provided and remain in communication when a worker is in an IDLH atmosphere;require that rescue equipment must be located nearby when work is beingdone in an IDLH atmosphere, and require that employees must wear safetyharnesses and lifelines when they use airline respirators in IDLH atmospheres.Section 1915.13 Cleaning and other cold work.This section describes those locations where cold work is permitted whencertain conditions have been met.Paragraph (a) provides a description of those spaces to which this sectionapplies. The proposed description is the same as the existing description.Paragraph (b)(1) provides that liquid residues in the tanks shall be removedas much as possible before manual cleaning starts. The existing rule containsthis same provision.Paragraph (b)(2) requires that a test to determine the concentration offlammable vapors must be done in the space prior to starting cold work.This test needs only be done when a flammable or combustible material wascontained or last contained in the space. This provision is unchanged fromthe existing provision, andSection; 1915.13(a)(3).Paragraph (b)(3) requires that the flammability test be conducted by acompetent person. This requirement is unchanged from the existing provision,andSection; 1915.13(a)(3).Paragraph (b)(4) requires that flammability tests be conducted frequentlyduring cold work. This requirement is unchanged from the existing provision,andSection; 1915.13(a)(3). However, OSHA has received many requests to definethe term ``frequently'' by specifying in the regulation how often tanksshould be checked. Since conditions may vary greatly from one situationto the next, OSHA does not believe that a requirement to recheck a tankat specified intervals would necessarily raise the level of safety. Instead,OSHA believes that the standard should be flexible enough to enable employersand employees to take into consideration all those factors which may influencethe need to recheck tank conditions including:1. Temperature_Higher temperatures will cause liquids to vaporize fasterthan lower temperatures; the result would be that on hotter days tank residuesmay produce more vapors with resultant concentrations in excess of 10 percentof the LEL.2. Work in the tank_Oxygen from a leaking welding hose could cause an oxygenenriched atmosphere; inert gas leaks from welding operations could producean oxygen deficient atmosphere. Tank cleaning can stir up residues andresult in changes in atmospheric conditions.3. Time elapsed_If a period of time has elapsed since the tank was lastchecked, it should be rechecked.4. Unattended tanks_Tanks declared safe and left unattended should be retestedprior to entry.5. Work breaks_When workers take a break or leave at the end of the shift,equipment is sometimes left in the tank. If welding equipment is left,the hoses may leak oxygen or inert gas, producing an oxygen enriched atmospherein the first case or an oxygen deficient atmosphere in the latter.6. Ballasting or trimming_Changing the position of the ballast or movingthe vessel so as to expose previously trapped cargo, can produce a changein tank atmosphere.In Issue Number 7, OSHA requests public comment as to whether the frequencyof retesting and the factors dictating retesting should be defined in thisstandard. If a more specific provision is believed appropriate, pleaseprovide a proposed definition and your rationale.Paragraph (b)(5) permits only cold work in the spaces described in andSection;1915.13(a). Hot work is only permitted as delineated in andSection; 1915.14.This is unchanged from the existing requirement, andSection; 1915.13(a)(4).Paragraph (b)(6) requires that the work area be kept cleaned up as workprogresses. This is unchanged from the existing provision, andSection; 1915.13(a)(1).Paragraph (b)(7) requires that the concentration of flammable vapors shallbe kept below 10 percent of the LEL. This paragraph also references provisionsthat permit exceptions to this ventilation requirement. This proposal isunchanged from the existing rule, andSection; 1915.13(a)(2).Paragraph (b)(8) requires that when highly volatile residues are presentand their presence prevents the maintenance of 10 percent of the LEL, then10 percent of the LEL need only be maintained in the major portions ofthe compartment. This proposed requirement is the same as the existingrequirement, andSection; 1915.13(a)(2).Paragraph (b)(9) requires that the competent person test to determine ifexhaust vapors from the spaces being ventilated are accumulating in oraround the vessel. This requirement is unchanged from the existing requirement,andSection; 1915.13(a)(5).Paragraph (b)(10) requires that ignition sources be prohibited in areaswhere flammable vapors are accumulating. This requirement is unchangedfrom the existing provision, andSection; 1915.13(a)(5).Paragraph (b)(11) proposes that any lamps used in areas that have containedflammable or combustible materials shall comply with 29 CFR 1910.307. Section1910.307 contains the requirements for electrical equipment used in hazardouslocations which are classified in andSection; 1910.399. Section 1910.307(b)requires that the equipment, wiring methods and installations of equipmentin these hazardous (classified) locations shall be either intrinsicallysafe, approved for the hazardous location, or safe for the hazardous (classified)location. Under the existing regulations at andSection;andSection; 1910.307and 1910.399, the hazardous (classified) locations having contained flammableor combustible materials would be classified as Class I, Division 1, andthe Group would be determined by the specific chemical present. The existingrule, andSection; 1915.13(b), requires that approved, explosion-proof, battery-fed,portable lamps shall be used in any areas that have carried flammablesor combustibles. In addition, the existing rule requires that equipmentbe approved by Underwriters Laboratories, MSHA or the U.S. Coast Guard.OSHA believes that both the proposed and existing requirements offer thesame level of protection. The proposed regulation, however, eliminatesspecification requirements and permits compliance with an existing generalindustry standard, andSection; 1910.307, which is equivalent to the levelof protection required in the existing standard.Paragraph (b)(12) requires that smoking and open flames be prohibited onthe open deck during cold work on cargo spaces or fuel tanks that havecarried flammable or combustible liquids or gases, on spaces or tanks thatare adjacent to compartments that have carried flammable or combustibleliquids or gases, or on equipment connected to such spaces or tanks. Thisrequirement is unchanged from the existing provision, andSection; 1915.13(c).Paragraph (b)(13) requires that metallic parts of air moving devices andduct work be bonded. This requirement is unchanged from the existing requirement,andSection; 1915.13(d).Paragraph (b)(14) prohibits the use of fan blades that can create sparks.The existing standard requires that nonferrous materials be used. The intentof the exising standard was to require the use of non-sparking materials.However, there are some types of stainless steel which are non-ferrous,but depending on content of carbon steel in proportion to nickel, can createsparks. The change to ``non-sparking'' would clarify the intent of theexising standard.Paragraph (b)(15) requires that portable air ducts be of non-sparking materials;the existing standard requires non-ferrous materials Again, the intentof the existing regulation is to prohibit duct material that can causesparks. The proposed requirement that portable air ducts be of ``non-sparking''material better accomplishes the purposes of the regulation.Paragraph (b)(16) requires that all motors and control equipment meet thesame requirements as required by 29 CFR 1910.307 for such equipment inhazardous locations classified in accordance with andSection; 1910.399. Theexisting standard, andSection; 1915.13(e), requires that such equipment beexplosion-proof. The proposed standard clarifies that electrical equipmentthat is used in a hazardous location must be intrinsically safe or safefor the particular hazardous location as already required in andSection;1910.307 (b)(2) (i), (ii), (b)(3), (c) and (d).Paragraph (b)(17) requires that all motors and control equipment be properlymaintained and grounded. This requirement is unchanged from the existingrequirement, andSection; 1915.13(e).The ``Note'' following andSection; 1915.13(b)(17) serves as a reminder toemployers and employees that prior to starting cold work spaces are tobe checked for toxic contaminants and appropriate precautions (i.e., ventilation,personal protective equipment or respirators) taken or used when necessary,and in accordance with andSection; 1915.12(c).Section 1915.14 Hot work.Section 1915.14 Hot work, addresses the safety precautions that must betaken prior to starting hot work on cargo or fuel tanks, related pipingand accessories. This section retains the provision that National FireProtection Association (NFPA) certified Marine Chemist or Coast Guard authorizedpersons must certify that certain spaces meet the requirements of ``Safefor Hot Work.'' This section also identifies those locations on vesselswhere the shipyard competent person is allowed to approve hot work.Section 1915.14 begins by referring users to Appendix A. Appendix A remindsusers that there are other important sections of the Part 1915 regulationsrelevant to hot work. Those sections, especially Subpart D, Welding, shouldbe reviewed carefully prior to starting hot work.Paragraph (a) requires that a Marine Chemist or a U.S. Coast Guard authorizedperson certify certain spaces as ``Safe for Hot Work.'' The Marine Chemistmust be an NFPA certified Marine Chemist. The Coast Guard authorized personis that person authorized by 46 CFR 35.01-1(c)(1) (tank vessels and barges),46 CFR 71.60-1(c)(1) (passenger vessels) and 46 CFR 91.50-1(c)(1) (cargoand miscellaneous vessels) to inspect and test these vessel spaces priorto hot work. There is no difference between the existing requirement andthe proposed requirement. The proposed language is easier to understandbecause the Coast Guard authorized person referred to has been definedin the definitions section and the cited CFR provisions have been reprintedin Appendix B for the convenience of the user.Paragraph (a)(1)(i) lists those areas on tank vessels requiring MarineChemist or Coast Guard certification prior to hot work: Cargo tanks whichcontain or have contained flammable or combustible liquids or gases inbulk; adjacent spaces; fuel tanks; and pipelines, pumps or any other accessoriesconnected to cargo or fuel tanks. This requirement is unchanged from theexisting requirements, andSection; 1915.14(a)(1)(i)-(iii).Paragraph (a)(1)(ii) lists those areas on dry cargo, miscellaneous andpassenger vessels that must be tested by a Marine Chemist or Coast Guardauthorized person and certified ``Safe for Hot Work'' prior to startingany hot work: Cargo spaces that have carried flammable or combustible liquidsin bulk; spaces adjacent to cargo tanks that have carried flammable gases,or liquids with a flash point below 150anddegrees;F., except when there ismore than 25 feet between the work and the cargo tank; fuel tanks thathave contained fuel; and pipelines, pumps or any other accessories connectedto the fuel or cargo tanks. This paragraph is unchanged from the existingprovisions, andSection; 1915.14(a)(2) (i) through (iv).Paragraph (a)(2) provides the criteria used to determine if a space is``Safe for Hot Work.'' The four criteria are based upon the existing criteriain NFPA 306, and one proposed change to NFPA 306. Paragraph (a)(2)(i) requiresthat the oxygen level in the space be 22.0 percent or less by volume. Thislevel of oxygen or lower provides a safe, non-oxygen enriched atmosphere.Atmospheres containing more than 22.0 percent oxygen by volume distortthe UEL by greatly expanding the normal flammable range and promoting veryrapid burning. This level, 22.0 percent oxygen by volume, was selectedin order to be in agreement with proposed NFPA 306 standards defining oxygen-enrichedatmospheres. This is based on a recommendation by the Technical Committeeon Gas Hazards of NFPA 306 to the full committee on gas hazards that anupper oxygen limit is needed to address the hazards of hot work in oxygenenriched atmospheres. The Technical committee has recommended an upperoxygen level of 22 percent oxygen by volume. OSHA has elected to adoptthis oxygen level of 22.0 percent by volume because instrument error inmeasurement can result in a variation of andplusmin; 1 percent. That is,when the oxygen level in a tank is 21 percent (normal oxygen content ofair at sea level), the instrument reading could actually vary from 20 percentto 22 percent. By selecting 22.0 percent oxygen, OSHA insures that a hazardous,oxygen-enriched atmosphere will not exist, taking into account normal instrumenterror.The second criteria is covered in paragraph (a)(2)(ii). This proposed revisionrequires that the flammable vapors and gases are below 10 percent of theflammable limit prior to hot work. This requirement has been adopted fromNFPA 306.Paragraph (a)(2)(iii) addresses the third criteria which requires thatthe Marine Chemist or the Coast Guard authorized person ensure that anyresidues found in the space will not produce an atmosphere at, or above,10 percent of the lower flammable limit. This provision is also based onexisting NFPA 306.Paragraph (a)(2)(iv) specifies the last requirement before a space maybe designated ``Safe for Hot Work.'' This provision would require thatadjacent spaces must be cleaned sufficiently to prevent the spread of fireor inerted. This criteria is based on NFPA 306-1988, paragraph 1-6.3(d)3-3.1.4and is also current industry practice.Although andSection; 1915.14(a)(2) and its subdivisions are newly includedin Subpart B, they do not present new information or requirements. Theexisting Subpart B, andSection; 1915.14(a), Hot Work, requires NFPA certifiedMarine Chemists or U.S. Coast Guard authorized persons to ensure that aspace is suitable for hot work, indicating that the NFPA definition of``Safe for Fire'' (now ``Safe for Hot Work'') is to be applied. The proposedSubpart B, for clarity and convenience, has incorporated these definitionsthat were previously only referenced.Paragraph (a)(3) provides that the term ``Not Safe for Hot Work'' mustbe used when any of the four conditions that constitute ``Safe for HotWork'' do not exist. This is a new paragraph that supplements the use ofthe term ``Safe for Hot Work'' by providing for those times when the fourcriteria for ``Safe for Hot Work'' have not been met.Paragraph (b) covers those areas of the vessel where a competent personcan give permission for hot work to proceed following a flammability test.The substantive requirements of this paragraph remain unchanged from theexisting requirements.Paragraph (b)(1) requires that hot work shall not be allowed on the followinguntil a test for flammability has been conducted:(1) Dry cargo spaces for which a Marine Chemist's or Coast Guard authorizedperson's certificate is not required; (2) The bilges;(3) The engine or boiler room where a Marine Chemist's or a Coast Guard'sauthorized person certificate is not required; The existing rules, covered in andSection;1915.14(b) and (c), contain thesame requirements found in proposed andSection;1915.14(b)(1) (i), (ii) and(iii). Paragraph (b)(2) requires that the spaces discussed in (b)(1) be testedfor flammability. This requirement is unchanged from existing andSection;1915.14(b)and (c). Paragraph (b)(3) requires that a competent person conduct the flammabilitytest. This requirement is unchanged from that found in existing andSection;1915.14(b)and (c). Paragraph (b)(4) prohibits hot work in or on the spaces listed in (b)(1)when the concentration of flammable vapors has been found to be at or greaterthan 10 percent of the lower flammable limit. This provision is unchangedfrom the existing standard, andSection;1915.14(b) and (c). Paragraph (b)(5) is a new rule which requires employers to label spacesas ``Not Safe for Hot Work'' if those spaces or adjacent spaces containatmospheres at or above 10 percent of the lower explosive limit. Section 1915.15 Maintaining conditions. Section 1915.15, Maintaining conditions, discusses the steps which mustbe taken when conditions in tanks are altered after the initial approvalsto enter and start work. Paragraph (a) requires that pipelines be disconnected or blanked off toprevent hazardous substances from entering spaces that have been determinedto be ``Safe for Workers'' or ``Safe for Hot Work.'' This proposed paragraphapplies to shipbuilding, shipbreaking and ship repair; the existing paragraphcovered only ship repair. Since this situation could occur on any vesselthat has carried or contained a flammable or combustible material in bulk,a toxic substance or an asphyxiant, regardless of whether that vessel isbeing built, repaired or broken, the requirements have been rewritten tocover these conditions. Paragraph (b) requires that when valves are manipulated or manholes opened,resulting in altered conditions, the spaces must be retested to determinethat they continue to meet the requirements in andSection;andSection;1915.12,1915.13 and 1915.14 as applicable. This paragraph covers all shipbuilding,breaking and repairing. Paragraph (c) requires that before hot work is begun on the weather deckover spaces which do not have to be safe for hot work, all valves, closuresand vents to the weatherdeck shall be closed, except for vented up masts.This requirement is unchanged from the existing requirement, andSection;1915.14(a)(2),but has been expanded to cover shipbreaking and new construction. Thiscoverage expansion is proposed because vessels and vessel sections, whichhave contained flammables or combustibles as part of the work process,would present the same hazard during construction and breaking as thoseunder repair if valves were opened to tanks containing an atmosphere having10% or more of the lower explosive limit and during hot work on the weatherdeck. Paragraph (d) requires that a competent person conduct frequent tests ofthe spaces previously tested by the Marine Chemist or by the Coast Guardauthorized person to determine if atmospheric conditions have changed.There are several factors which may influence the frequency with whichspaces need to be retested, such as temperature, volatility of the residues,type of work being done in the tank, or trimming in the vessel. The existingrule provides this same requirement in andSection;1915.15(a)(4), (b)(1) and(b)(2) but limits it to ship repair and shipbreaking. By expanding thisrequirement to shipbuilding, this rule would require rechecking of anyspace or tank initially checked by a Marine Chemist or a Coast Guard authorizedperson. If the tank initially required checking by a competent person,then andSection;1915.15(f) would apply. Public comment is requested in Issue10 regarding follow up inspections. Paragraph (e) directs employers to stop work and get a new Marine Chemistor Coast Guard authorized person certificate if atmospheric conditionson which the initial certificate was based have changed so that they nolonger meet OSHA requirements. This rule is unchanged from existing requirements,andSection;1915.15(a)(4), (b)(1) and (b)(2), except that the proposed paragraphwould be expanded to cover shipbuilding. It specifically applies only tothose spaces that have required Chemist's or Coast Guard authorized personcertificates. Paragraph (f) directs the competent person to frequently retest the atmosphericconditions that he or she initially determined to be safe for entry, hotor cold work. This requirement to maintain safe atmospheric conditionsis unchanged from existing requirements found in andSection;1915.15(a)(4),(b)(1) and (b)(2). However, it does add new construction to its coverage,but only those spaces that would require competent person inspection; thatis, it would require the competent person to recheck some spaces periodicallyfor oxygen deficient or flammable atmospheres. In Issue Number 7, public comment is requested regarding a useful definitionof the term ``frequent.'' Paragraph (g) requires the competent person to insure that the atmospherein the spaces previously tested by that person stays within the acceptablelimits of the standard; that is, not above 10 percent LEL and not below19.5 percent oxygen without respiratory protection. If conditions do notmeet these levels, work must be stopped and conditions restored to theselevels. This paragraph is the same as found in the existing standards,andSection;1915.15(a)(4), (b)(1) and (b)(2). Section 1915.16 Warning signs. Section 1915.16, Warning signs, discusses warning signs for all vesselsduring ship building, breaking and repair. The reason for this uniformcoverage is that hazardous atmospheres may occur in spaces during any ofthese activities if flammable or combustible products have been introducedinto the cargo containment system or the fuel system. Paragraph (a) requires that only those spaces which are unsafe be labeledas such. This rule is the same as the existing rules, andSection;1915.16(a)and (b). Further, Appendix A suggests alternative, equivalent measures,i.e., that employers label the gangways and other means of access to vessels,instead of the individual tanks and spaces, if the entire vessel is inthe same condition. This limited alternative method of compliance is thesame as existing andSection;1915.16(c). Public comment is requested in Issue Number 11 as to whether or not allconditions, safe and unsafe, should be marked on tanks. Paragraph (b) requires that employers be responsible for employee' workingand obeying all signs and limitations on tank entry. This provision isunchanged from existing andSection;1915.15(a)(3). Appendix A to Subpart B_Explosive and Other Dangerous Atmospheres This Appendix is a non-mandatory set of guidelines provided to assist employersin complying with the requirements of this subpart. This Appendix neithercreates additional obligations nor eliminates obligations otherwise containedin the standard. It is intended to provide explanatory information andeducational material to employers and employees to foster understandingof, and compliance with, the standard.   Appendix B to Subpart B_Explosive and Other Dangerous AtmospheresThis Appendix provides a complete reprint of U.S. Coast Guard regulationsreferenced in Subpart B for purposes of determining who is a Coast Guardauthorized person. Specific IssuesIn addition to any other comments the public wishes to make on this standard,comments are requested on the following specific issues: 1. A definition for inert or inerted atmosphere has been added to the proposedstandards in andSection; 1915.11(b). In the first part of the definition,employers are allowed to inert by reducing the oxygen content of the atmosphereto 8.0 percent oxygen or below by volume, or 50 percent the amount requiredto support combustion, whichever is less. Comment is requested as to the appropriate oxygen levels for inerting.Comment is also requested as to whether the minimum oxygen for combustion(MOC) figures are readily available to employers, or whether they shouldbe published along with the standard. The maximum permissible oxygen percentageto prevent ignition of flammable gases and vapors using nitrogen and carbondioxide for inerting can be found in the 14th edition of the Fire ProtectionHandbook, published by NFPA, as well as in other sources. 2. Section 1915.11(b) requires that the Marine Chemist must carry a validcertificate issued by the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA).At least one commenter has argued that this requirement is too restrictive,and that there are other individuals who are equally capable of performingthe tasks assigned the Marine Chemist. Comment is requested regarding OSHA'srequirement that all Marine Chemists be NFPA certified. Are there othergroups, other than NFPA, who are qualified to assess the qualificationsand abilities of a Marine Chemist? Are there additional groups, other thanthe NFPA, who could provide the training and testing necessary to produceMarine Chemists with a skill level equal to those produced currently byNFPA? Are there geographical areas of the country that have difficulty gettingMarine Chemists? Is work delayed as a result? How often does this situationoccur? For how long is the work delayed? Do work backlogs occur becauseof the unavailability of Marine Chemists? If work is backlogged, for howlong is this the case? Does OSHA's requirement to use an NFPA certified Marine Chemist inhibit,encourage or have no impact on innovation in safe tank entry and work?Please provide supporting documentation for your position. 3. Section 1915.11(b) provides a definition for the phrase ``Not Safe forWorkers.'' This phrase is adopted from NFPA 306. The term is used to meantwo different things: (1) That a space is not safety to enter under anycircumstances; or (2) that employee entry is permitted, but is restrictedby the length of time the employee may be exposed, or restricted by theneed for respiratory protection or personal protective equipment. Therefore, a space might be posted ``Not Safe for Workers'' when in factit could be safe but with certain restrictions. Comment is requested asto whether or not an additional category of ``Safe with Restrictions''should be added and used when entry is permitted but additional protectionor constraints are required. This concept is being used by NFPA 306. 4. Sections 1915.12(a)(3), (b)(3) and (c)(3) all require atmospheric testingprior to initial entry into spaces. OSHA recognizes that confusion exists regarding the use of the term ``initialentry.'' The Coast Guard has interpreted OSHA's use of the term ``initialentry'' to mean that when more than 24 hours have elapsed since a tankhas been determined safe for entry and/or hot work, it must be recheckedto determine if it is still safe for hot work and/or safe for entry. OSHA has no formal interpretation, explanation or policy statement explainingwhat constitutes an ``initial entry'' into a space. Comments are requestedregarding the definition of the term ``initial entry.'' Should OSHA seta time limit on ``initial entry''? Commenters are urged to review a relatedissue, frequency of inspection, when drafting responses to this issue.5. Section 1915.12(c)(2) requires that the toxicity test required priorto entry be conducted by an NFPA certified Marine Chemist, an ABIH industrialhygienist, or a Coast Guard authorized person. In official Agency correspondence,OSHA has said that these persons are what is meant by an NFPA certifiedMarine Chemist, an industrial hygienist, or an other qualified person.According to official Agency correspondence, this last person is one whocan be appointed by the Coast Guard as authorized under 46 CFR 35.01-1(c)(1),71.60-1(c)(1) or 91.50-1(c)(1), to inspect when a Marine Chemist is notreasonably available. Comment is requested as to who are the appropriatepersons to conduct initial toxicity testing and prescribe any protectiveequipment or respiratory protection that may be needed. Comments on thismatter should provide suitable documentation. 6. Section 1915.12(d) permits emergency work and work of brief durationto be performed in UEL or IDLH atmospheres provided no ignition sourcesare present and provided the UEL atmosphere is monitored continuously.Comments and additional information are requested on several sections ofthis paragraph. Should emergency work be defined? If so, what definitionshould be used? (See, for example, 29 CFR 1915.152(b)(3).) Should a timelimit be used to define the term ``brief duration''? If so, what shouldthat time limit be and why? Is work ever conducted in UEL atmospheres?How often is this done? What is the nature of the work and what are therestrictions placed upon that activity? Are yards equipped with the metersnecessary to determine that they are operating in a UEL atmosphere? Howfar above the UEL do yards allow work? What are the restrictions placedupon ignition sources in and near UEL atmospheres? How do yards preventthe atmosphere from being diluted and thus entering the flammable range?Should work in UEL atmospheres be prohibited? Why? 7. Proposed andSection;andSection; 1915.13(b)(4) and 1915.15 address the requirementto conduct atmospheric tests frequently. Section 1915.13(b)(4) would requirethat factors which could influence the frequency of rechecking, such asair temperature and residue volatility, shall be considered when determininghow often to recheck. Paragraphs (d) and (f) of andSection; 1915.15 discussthe need for frequent atmospheric tests in order to maintain the initialworking conditions in the tank. OSHA's proposed standards, however, donot specify how frequently a tank should be rechecked. Public comment issolicited as to whether OSHA should specify the frequency of testing inthe standard. If so, what should that frequency be and why? Should thefactors which influence the need to check tanks frequently be addresseddirectly in the standard? What factors, in addition to those covered inthe Appendix, should be addressed under this subject? Should OSHA changethe term ``frequently'' to ``as often as necessary?'' If so, why? 8. Should OSHA regulations require that the employer ascertain the lastthree cargoes carried in tanks covered by this standard? NFPA 306 currentlycontains such a requirement for Marine Chemists who are testing tanks.Is there a need for OSHA to adopt this requirement?9. Should OSHA prohibit hot work on bulkheads where insulation has notbeen stripped away? If so, how much of the insulation shall be removed?Have there been situations where toxic vapors have evolved as a resultof heating insulation? Have there been situations where insulation hasbeen heated during hot work and fires have broken out during the hot workor after the hot work had been completed? Please document these occurrences,providing a description of the accidents, the number of times as well asthe period of time over which they have occurred. Are there means of performinghot work on insulation which will not create hazards? Please provide supportingdata.10. In andSection;1915.15(d), should the shipyard competent person be requiredto conduct a physical examination of the tank and pipelines when makinga follow up inspection?11. Section 1915.16(a) addresses warning signs to be placed on tanks. Shouldall conditions, safe or unsafe, be marked on tanks? If you support thatposition please provide both costs and injury data associated with placingsigns on safe and unsafe tanks. Should only unsafe conditions be marked?Please provide a rationale for your position.12. Section 1915.18 addresses the shipyard competent person. CurrentlyOSHA does not require any specific training or certification to assurethat individuals designated as a ``Competent Person'' by their employersare indeed knowledgeable and competent. Yet the responsibilities of thesedesignated individuals impact heavily on safety and health in the shipyardemployment workplace.There have been many suggestions that OSHA establish (or approve) a trainingprogram(s) for would-be Shipyard Competent Persons, and after successfulcompletion of that training program, certify (or have certified by someresponsible organization or agency) that such individuals are indeed ``ShipyardCompetent Persons.''OSHA seeks comment on the following specific issues:A. Should OSHA require certification of Shipyard Competent Persons? Ifso, what organization(s) should be responsible for certification? If so,what skill level or knowledge requirements should such persons meet? Shouldthey meet additional criteria, above and beyond that required in andSection;1915.7(b)?What should be the additional criteria? Why?B. Since it would likely take a period of time before all current CompetentPersons could be trained, should OSHA make this requirement effective someperiod of time after this revised Subpart B becomes effective? How longshould this period be?C. Should there be periodic recertification to assure that the CertifiedShipyard Competent Person has retained his or her skills and knowledge?If not, why not? If so, how often should such recertification be required?D. How many people would need this certification/recertification? Locally?Regionally? For what geographic area are you providing these numbers?E. Should such training be mandatory or voluntary? If not, should therebe incentives to encourage enrollment? What incentives would be most attractive?Why? If this training were mandatory how much would you estimate it wouldcost? What would be the benefits associated with such training? Pleasequantify the benefits associated with such training.13. Should OSHA require that the atmosphere in tanks or compartments adjacentto ones under inert purge be tested for oxygen deficiency prior to entry?Should OSHA require that prior to purging, the entire length of the purgingline be checked for proper construction, attachment and installation toprevent leaks into compartments not being purged?Should OSHA require alarms or portable detectors where the integrity ofan inert gas purging system cannot be assured?Have there been accidents as a result of inert gas system leaks? Pleaseprovide accident data covering the number of accidents, the period of timeover which they occurred and a description of the accidents.14. OSHA has proposed to eliminate the current recordkeeping requirementsthat employers designate a competent person on an OSHA Form 73 and thensend that form to the closest area office. In its place, OSHA is proposinga requirement that employers shall prepare a certification record consistingof an employer record identifying the competent person(s) or a statementthat Marine Chemists are always used, the employer's name, and date ofcertification. This action reduces the paperwork burden on employers. OSHAproposes to apply this provision to all competent person requirements inSubparts B, C, D and H. Should OSHA take these actions? If so, why?15. OSHA's existing rule requires that routine work of substantial length(other than inerting) cannot occur in atmospheres less than 16.5 percentoxygen by volume. In such cases, ventilation is required to bring the oxygenlevel up to 16.5 percent. With the proposed change, OSHA will now allowroutine entry and work in atmospheres with less than 16.5 percent oxygen<T3>provided </T3>appropriate respiratory protection is worn.In addition, respiratory protection will now be required for any atmospherecontaining oxygen levels between 16.5 percent and 19.5 percent. The existingrule allows unprotected entry between 16.5 percent and 19.5 percent.OSHA believes that the proposed rule provides the appropriate level ofprotection to workers while permitting employers the flexibility of choosingthe most suitable and economical control measures for each vessel and vesselsection being serviced.OSHA solicits comments on the appropriate control measures to be requiredin this proposal.16. In this proposed standard OSHA is recommending that the requirementfor the 1970 American Conference of Governmental Industrial Hygieniststhreshold limit values, which are in the current regulations (andSection;1915.5),be replaced with the OSHA permissible exposure limits (PEL's) found in29 CFR Part 1910, Subpart Z. OSHA acknowledges the current proposal torevise the PEL's for general industry, 53 FR 20960 (June 7, 1988). OSHAplans to carefully study the need to bring the shipyard air containmentsrequirements in line with those proposed for general industry. That actionwill not be a part of this proposal, but will be considered in the future.Your input is solicited on this matter.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. American National Standards Institute/National Fire ProtectionAssociation, <T3>NFPA 306 Control of Gas Hazards on Vessels </T3>(1988).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Manning, George C., M.S., B.S., <T3>Manual of Ship Construction, </T3>D. Van Nostrand Company, Inc., NewYork (1942).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. National Fire Protection Association, <T3>Hazardous Materials, </T3>6th Edition, 325M-5 (1975).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Regulations of the United States Department of Transportation,46 CFR 35.01-1(c)(1); 71.60-1(c)(1); 91.50-1(c)(1) (1987).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Regulations of the United States Department of Transportation,49 CFR 1.46(t) (1987).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Regulatory Assessment</ITAG>Introduction and SummaryIn accordance with Executive Order No. 12291 (46 FR 13193, February 17,1981), OSHA has analyzed the economic impact of this proposed standard.Under the criteria established in Executive Order 12291, OSHA has determinedthat the promulgation of this proposed standard would not be a ``major''action because all of its requirements are consistent with current industrypractices and are part of existing consensus or OSHA standards. The proposedstandard would impose no costs of compliance upon shipyards.BackgroundUnder Executive Order 12291, OSHA is required, in general, to submit anyNotice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM) for ``all rules other than major rules''to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) at least 10days prior to publication in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>The economic impact estimates presented in this preamble are estimatesbased upon the data currently available to OSHA. These estimates will berefined as OSHA receives additional information. Consequently, OSHA solicitsfurther comments on these estimates, and any comments will be addressedand incorporated into the Regulatory Impact Assessment (RIA) for the finalrule.Data SourcesThe primary source for this section is the April 1986, Draft Final Reportby CONSAD Research Corporation entitled, ``Data to Support Regulatory Analysisof the Proposed Standard for Shipbuilding and Repairing: Subpart B.'' Inaddition, OSHA also used an October 1984 report by Main Hurdman/KMG entitled,``Profile of the Shipbuilding and Repairing Industry.''Industry ProfileThe entire shipbuilding, ship repairing, and shipbreaking industries wouldbe affected by the proposed revision of the provisons found in the existingPart 1915 Subpart B that govern work in explosive and other dangerous atmospheresin shipyards. In recent years, shipyards have not prospered as an industry.In 1985, there were about 400 shipyards operating, 200 fewer than the activenumber of shipyards in 1980. Another illustration is that there were ordersfor 69 merchant vessels (1.82 million tons) in U.S. shipyards in 1980 butonly for 10 merchant vessels (140,915 tons) by 1984. Although this lossof business has been partially offset by the increase in the U.S. Navy'sdemand for ships, the decline in the demand for commercial ships will likelygenerate a further decline in the number of active shipyards.Population at RiskOSHA has estimated that every shipyard employee who works on vessels andvessel sections will be affected by the provisions in this proposed standard.The actual number of these employees will depend upon the level of shipyardwork. For example, shipyards employed 177,300 workers in 1980 and about145,000 in 1984. Consequently, because there is the potential for largechanges in the demand for ships, OSHA has estimated that the populationat risk would be between 145,000 and 180,000 employees.Risk of Fatality or InjuryOSHA has been unable to estimate the annual number of shipyard fatalitiesand injuries resulting from accidents associated with explosive or toxicatmospheres because there are no available fatality and injury data. However,OSHA has anecdotal information derived from accident investigations andresearch concerning fatalities that have occurred in these atmospheres.(Exhibit numbers 1 and 2.)andbullet; The deceased had been one of seven workers from a temporary helpservice who were removing mud and water (in a ``mucking'' operation) fromthe hull of a floating dry dock. Mud and silt were removed from the bottomof the 300-ton U-shaped vessel used to lift ships from the water for repairs.The hull contained several compartments. There was an odor of a flammablesubstance similar to gas or oil present in the compartment. At some point,an explosion occurred fatally injuring the man and hospitalizing four others.The employer was cited for failure to test the atmosphere for flammablelevels and for oxygen deficiency.andbullet; The two deceased men had been employed by a painting and tankcleaning contractor to clean and paint a salt water ballast tank in thebow of a vessel. The tank had been cleaned the day before and the two menhad proceeded with the spray painting using methyl ethyl ketone (MEK) asa paint thinner. They completed the first coat. The second day they returnedto complete the second coat. Prior to entering the tank no test was performedto determine the lower explosive limit. No mechanical ventilation of anykind was provided to dispel the vapors. After painting for approximatelyan hour, there was an explosion that killed both men. The source of ignitionwas believed to be from one of the two hand-held portable lamps.andbullet; One worker was asphyxiated and a second worker was hospitalizedwhen they entered a cargo space that had contained flammable or combustiblematerials. That space's atmosphere had not been tested by a competent personprior to their entry. In addition, no competent person had been designatedor indicated on an OSHA 73 form, and there was no log of such tests availableat the job site. andbullet; In another incident, five employees were hospitalized after theyinhaled petroleum product vapors in a confined space on a vessel. The atmospherein the cargo space had not been tested by a competent person prior to theentry of the employees. In addition, no atmospheric testing was done bya competent person while the men were working in this space. andbullet; In another similar but unrelated incident, five employees wereinjured when insufficient respiratory protection was provided against thehazards of inhalation of chemical liquids and vapors. These employees hadbeen assigned to do cold work in a tank that had carried a flammable orcombustible liquid or gas. The shipyard had neither designated a competentperson to test for the presence of flammable vapors, nor provided naturalor mechanical ventilation while the employees were in the tank. Furthermore,no rechecking of the tank's atmosphere was performed while the men werein the tank. andbullet; An oxygen-enriched atmosphere was formed when a welding torchgas manifold malfunctioned. This malfunction prevented the flow of gas,but not the flow of exygen, into a torch being used in a confined space.When the malfunction was rectified and the employee lit his torch, a flashfire occurred due to the oxygen-enriched atmosphere. The employee diedin the fire. Had the atmosphere been tested prior to initiating hot work,the accident could have been avoided. As a result of these and other similar incidents, the known hazardous natureof operations in these types of atmospheres has led OSHA, the NationalFire Protection Association (NFPA), and shipyards to establish the specificwork practices embodied in the proposed OSHA standard. Further, many shipyardshave required their employees to follow these work practices. Where thesesafe work practices have been adopted, there have been relatively few relatedinjuries and fatalities. Feasibility, Benefits, and CostsOSHA has determined that this proposed standard would be technologicallyfeasible because it would require the use of existing and readily availabletechnology, equipment, and current work practices. One source of potential benefits is from the rewriting of the provisionsof this subpart to make them clearer and easier to understand. This actionwill eliminate some ambiguity concerning the specific provisions with whicha shipyard employer must comply. Another source of potential benefits is that the provisions in the proposedsubpart have been designed to be consistent with the requirements of theconsensus standards, where appropriate. Many shipyards already comply withthe consensus standards such as NFPA 306, because such compliance has beenproven to reduce shipyard hazards and resultant fatalities and injuries.It also may be required by insurance companies for property damage insurance.Thus, to the extent that the proposed subpart is more consistent with NFPAstandards than the existing OSHA standards, the proposed subpart couldreduce the costs of compliance to shipyards while not reducing the levelof employee safety. The basis of the estimated costs of compliance with the proposed standardis the CONSAD report. In order to obtain this information, CONSAD conducteda series of eight focus group meetings, which were attended by individualshipyards, labor groups, safety professionals, and marine chemists. CONSADcirculated copies of the proposed standard and then elicited informationconcerning any potential economic impacts. The information received byCONSAD was used to develop its estimated costs of compliance. OSHA hasadopted that estimate as the best available estimate.With respect to this proposed standard, CONSAD received no informationindicating that shipyards were not in compliance with the proposed provisions.Thus, OSHA has determined that there would be no cost of compliance associatedwith the proposed standard. Nevertheless, as previously mentioned, thisis a Preliminary Regulatory Impact Assessment (PRIA), and OSHA invitespublic comment concerning this determination. Any comment received willbe carefully analyzed by OSHA for incorporation into the RIA for this finalrule. Regulatory Flexibility Certification Pursuant to the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>), the Assistant Secretary has preliminarily certifiedthat the proposed standard would not have a significant impact upon a substantialnumber of small entities because there would be no costs of compliance.OSHA invites public comment concerning this certification. The regulatory assessment is available for inspection and copying at theOSHA Technical Data Center, Room N-2634, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW.,Washington, DC 20210. OSHA invites comments concerning the conclusionsreached in this Preliminary Regulatory Impact Assessment and the RegulatoryFlexibility Certification. <ITAG tagnum="84">V. Environmental Assessment </ITAG>Finding of No Significant Impact This proposed rule and its major alternatives have been reviewed in accordancewith the requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of1969 (42 U.S.C. 4321 <T3>et seq.</T3>), the Guidelines of the Council of Environmental Quality(CEQ) (40 CFR Part 1500), and OSHA's DOL NEPA Procedures (29 CFR Part 11).As a result of this review, the Assistant Secretary for OSHA has determinedthat the proposed rule will have no significant environmental impact.The proposed revisions to 29 CFR 1915.11-16, Subpart B_Explosive and OtherDangerous Atmospheres, focus on the reduction of accidents or injuriesby means of work practices and procedures, as well as on changes in language,definition, and format of the standard. These revisions do not impact onair, water, or soil quality, plant or animal life, the use of land, orother aspects of the environment. As such, these revisions are therefore,categorized as excluded actions according to 29 CFR 11.10 of the DOL NEPAregulations. <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Recordkeeping Requirements </ITAG>This subpart substantially reduces the recordkeeping burden on employersby removing duplicative recordkeeping requirements and replacing a recordkeepingrequirement with a certification. Only a requirement for maintaining theOSHA 74, the Log of Inspections and Tests by Competent Persons, has beenretained. The existing Subpart B regulations mandate that a Marine Chemist, whenperforming atmospheric tests in lieu of a shipyard competent person, mustcomplete two reports on test results: the Marine Chemist's certificate<T3>and </T3>OSHA's Log of Inspections and Tests (OSHA 74). These two reportscontain the same information. The proposed rule eliminates the requirementfor completing both forms and instead requires either an OSHA 74 or a MarineChemists' form.The requirement that employers complete an OSHA 73, Designation of CompetentPersons, and send it into the nearest OSHA area office, has been replacedwith a certification requirement. Under this new certification requirement,an employer must be able to provide evidence substantiating the fact thathe has met his legal obligation to designate shipyard competent persons.This certification requirement eliminates the employer's paperwork burden.Only the paperwork requirement for completing the OSHA 74 has been retained.The OSHA 74, Log of Tests and Inspection by Competent Persons, providesa record of atmospheric tests by location. This information warns employersabout hazardous atmospheres and allows employees to determine if atmosphericconditions are changing_an important indicator of developing hazardousconditions. In cases where a Marine Chemist performs this task, he is permittedto substitute his own form which contains the same information as the OSHA74. By making these changes, OSHA has reduced the paperwork burden on employerswhile continuing to provide protection for employees.In accordance with the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. 3501<T3>et seq. </T3>) and the regulations issued pursuant thereto (5 CFR Part1320) (See 48 FR 13666, March 31, 1983), OSHA certifies that it has submittedthe information collection requirements contained in this proposed revisionto its current standards to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) forreview under section 3504(h) of that Act. Comments on these informationcollection requirements may be submitted by interested parties to the Officeof Information and Regulatory Affairs of OMB, Attention: Desk Officer forthe Occupational Safety and Health Administration, 726 Jackson Place NW.,Washington, DC 20503. OSHA requests that copies of such comments also besubmitted to the OSHA Docket Office, as part of the record for this rulemaking.<ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Public Participation</ITAG>Interested persons are invited to submit written data, views, and argumentswith respect to this proposal. The comments must be postmarked by February27, 1989, and submitted in quadruplicate to the Docket Officer, DocketNo. S-050, U.S. Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration,200 Constitution Avenue NW., Washington, DC 20210.The data, views, and arguments that are submitted will be available forpublic inspection and copying at the above address. All timely submissionsreceived will be made a part of the record of this proceeding.Additionally, under section 6(b)(3) of the OSH Act (29 U.S.C. 657) and29 CFR 1911.11, interested parties may file objections to the proposaland request an informal hearing. The objections and hearing requests shouldbe submitted in quadruplicate to the Docket Officer at the address aboveand must comply with the following conditions:1. The objections must include the name and address of the objector;2. The objections must be postmarked by February 27, 1989.3. The objections must specify with particularity the provisions of theproposed rule to which each objection is taken and must state the groundstherefore;4. Each objection must be separately stated and numbered; and5. The objections must be accompanied by a detailed summary of the evidenceproposed to be adduced at the requested hearing.Interested persons who have objections to various provisions or have changesto recommend may of course make these objections or recommendations intheir comments and OSHA will fully consider them. There is only need tofile formal ``objections'' separately if the interested person desiresto request an oral hearing.OSHA recognizes that there may also be interested persons who, throughtheir knowledge of safety or their experience in the operations involved,would wish to endorse or support certain provisions in the standard. OSHAwelcomes such supportive comments, including any pertinent accident dataor cost information which may be available, in order that the record ofthis rulemaking will present a balanced picture of the public responseon the issues involved.<ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. State Plan Standards</ITAG>Those of the 25 States with their own OSHA-approved occupational safetyand health plans whose plans cover the issues of maritime safety and healthmust revise their existing standard within six months of the publicationdate of the final standard or show OSHA why there is no need for action,e.g., because an existing State standard covering this area is already``at least as effective'' as the revised Federal standard. Currently fourStates (Minnesota, Oregon, Vermont and Washington) with their own Stateplans cover private sector on-shore maritime activities. Federal OSHA enforcesmaritime standards offshore in all states and provides onshore coverageof maritime activities in Federal OSHA States and in the following Stateplan States: Alaska, Arizona, California,\1\<NOTE/> Connecticut,\1\ Hawaii, Indiana, Iowa, Kentucky, Maryland,Michigan, Nevada, New Mexico, New York,\1\ North Carolina, Puerto Rico,South Carolina, Tennessee, Utah, Virginia, Virgin Islands, and Wyoming.(All States with State plans must also extend coverage to State and localgovernment employees engaged in maritime activities.)<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Plan covers only State and local government employes.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 29 CFR Part 1915</ITAG>Cold work, Confined space entry on marine vessels, Flammable atmospheres,Hot work certification, Marine chemist, Marine safety, Marine vessels,Occupational safety and health, Oxygen deficient atmospheres, Safety, Shipyardcompetent person, Shipyard employment, Toxic atmosphere.<ITAG tagnum="84">Authority</ITAG>This document was prepared under the direction of John A. Pendergrass,Assistant Secretary of Labor for Occupational Safety and Health, U.S. Departmentof Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue NW., Washington, DC 20210.Accordingly, pursuant to section 41 of the Longshore and Harbor Worker'sCompensation Act, as amended (72 Stat. 835; 33 U.S.C. 941), sections 4,6 and 8 of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (84 Stat. 1593,1598; 29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657), 29 CFR Part 1911 and Secretary of Labor'sOrder No. 9-83 (48 FR 35736), it is proposed to amend 29 CFR Part 1915as set forth below.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC, this 17th day of November 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">John A. Pendergrass,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary of Labor.</ITAG>For the reasons set forth in the preamble, Title 29, Part 1915 of the Codeof Federal Regulations is proposed to be amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 1915_OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH STANDARDS FOR SHIPYARD EMPLOYMENT</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 1915 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 41, Longshore and Harbor Workers' CompensationAct (33 U.S.C. 941); secs. 4, 6, 8, Occupational Safety and Health Actof 1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657); Secretary of Labor's Order No. 12-71(36 FR 8754), 8-76 (41 FR 25059) or 9-83 (48 FR 36736), as applicable;29 CFR Part 1911.</ITAG>2. Section 1915.7 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1915.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Competent person.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Designation. </T3>(1) For the purposes of Subparts B, C, D and H ofthis part, except for andSection;andSection; 1915.35(b)(8) and 1915.36(a)(5),one or more competent persons shall be designated by the employer in accordancewith the applicable requirements of this section, unless the requirementsof Subpart B, C, D and H are always carried out by a Marine Chemist ora Coast Guard authorized person.(2) The employer shall prepare a certification record which includes theemployer's name, the identification of the competent person or a statementthat a Marine Chemist or a Coast Guard authorized person is being used,and provide the date this record was prepared. The most recent certificationrecord shall be maintained on file.(b) <T3>Criteria. </T3>Employers must ensure that employees designated as competentpersons have the following abilities and attributes:(1) Ability to understand certificates issued by Marine Chemists or byU.S. Coast Guard authorized persons.(2) Ability to carry out any written instructions left by Marine Chemists,Certified Industrial Hygienists or by the U.S. Coast Guard authorized persons.(3) Ability to calibrate, use, and correctly interpret the testing equipmentused.(4) Familiarity with and understanding of Subparts B, C, D and H.(5) Familiarity with the structure and knowledge of the location and designationof spaces on the types of vessels where work is done.(6) Capability to perform the tests and inspections required by SubpartsB, C, D and H.(7) Ability to enter the appropriate information in the required logs.(c) <T3>Logging of inspections and tests. </T3>(1) When tests and inspectionsrequired by any provisions of B, C, D and H of this part, except thosereferred to in andSection;andSection; 1915.35(b)(8) and 1915.36(a)(5), areperformed by a competent person, Certified Industrial Hygienist, or U.S.Coast Guard authorized person, a record of the locations, operations performedand date, time and results of the test and any instructions resulting therefromshall be recorded on U.S. Department of Labor Form OSHA 74 ``Log of Inspectionsand Tests by Competent Persons.''(2) Employers shall require Marine Chemists to record test locations andresults including time, date and location of vessels inspected, operationsperformed, as well as any instructions.(3) A separate OSHA 74 or Marine Chemist's or Coast Guard authorized person'scertificate shall be maintained for each vessel and vessel section on whichtests and inspections are made.(4) The OSHA 74 and the records required in paragraph (b) of this sectionshall be available for inspection in the immediate vicinity of the affectedoperations while they are in progress.(5) The OSHA 74 and the records required in paragraphs (c) (1) and (2)of this section shall be kept on file for a period of at least three monthsfrom the date of the completion of the job.(d) <T3>Application. </T3>The provisions of this section are intended to applyin their entirety to employers engaged in general ship repair, shipbuildingand shipbreaking. They do not apply in their entirety to employers whosework involves only certain portions of Subparts B, C, and D of this partsuch as:(1) Repair work on small craft in boat yards where only combustible gasindicator tests are necessary for fuel tank leaks or when using flammablepaints below decks;(2) The building of wooden vessels where only knowledge of the precautionsto be taken when using flammable paints is necessary; and(3) The breaking of vessels with no exposure to fuel oil or other flammablehazards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">In such cases, employers are allowed to select their competent person(s)on the basis of the applicable portions of the criteria set forth in paragraph(b) of this section.3. Subpart B of Part 1915 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Explosive and Other Dangerous Atmospheres in Vessels andVessel Sections</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1915.11 Scope, application, and definitions applicable to this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1915.12 Precautions before entering compartments or spaces.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1915.13 Cleaning and other cold work.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1915.14 Hot work.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1915.15 Maintaining conditions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1915.16 Warning signs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix A to Subpart B</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix B to Subpart B</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart B_Explosive and Other Dangerous Atmospheres in Vessels andVessel Sections</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1915.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope, application, and definitions applicable to this subpart.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Scope and application. </T3>This subpart sets forth requirements toprotect employees during work in explosive and other dangerous atmospheresin, and on, vessels and vessel sections during shipbuilding, ship repairing,and shipbreaking operations.(b) <T3>Definitions applicable to this subpart. </T3>``Adjacent compartmentsor spaces'' means those compartments or spaces which border upon the spacewhere the work is to be done, and those which are located on the diagonalfrom the space where the work is to be done.``Bulk'' means materials that are loaded or carried on board a vessel withoutbenefit of containers or labels, and received and handled by the vesselcarrier without mark or count.``Certified Industrial Hygienist (CIH)'' means an industrial hygienistwho is certified by the American Board of Industrial Hygiene.``Coast Guard authorized person'' means an individual who meets the requirementof 46 CFR 35.01-1(c)(1) for tank vessels; 46 CFR 71.60-1(c)(1) for passengervessels; and 46 CFR 91.50-1(c)(1) for cargo and miscellaneous vessels.For tank vessels, passenger vessels, and cargo and miscellaneous vesselsin ports or places in the United States or its territories and possessions,the authorized person shall be a Marine Chemist certificated by the NationalFire Protection Association; however, if the services of such certifiedMarine Chemist are not reasonably available, the U.S. Coast Guard, Officerin Charge, Marine Inspection, upon the recommendation of the vessel ownerand his contractor or their representative, shall select a person who,in the case of an individual vessel, shall be authorized to make such inspection.(See Appendix B for a copy of 46 CFR 35.01-1(c)(1); 46 CFR 71.60-1(c)(1);and 46 CFR 91.50-1(c)(1).)``Competent person'' means an individual satisfying the criteria set forthin andSection; 1915.7.``Hot work'' means riveting, welding, burning, the use of powder-actuatedtools or similar fire-producing operations. Grinding, drilling, sand orshot blasting, or similar spark-producing operations shall be consideredhot work except when they are physically isolated from an environment whichis greater than 10% of the lower explosive limit. (See Appendix A.)``Immediately dangerous to life or health (IDLH)'' means any atmospherethat poses an immediate threat to life, or which is likely to result inacute or immediate severe health effects.``Inert or inerted atmosphere'' means that (1) the oxygen content of theatmosphere in the space is at or below 8.0 percent by volume or the oxygencontent is at or below 50 percent of the amount required to support combustion,whichever is less; or, (2) that the space has been flooded with water;that any hot work is performed at least three feet below the water level;and that the gas content of the atmosphere above the water does not exceed10 percent of the lower explosive limit.``Lower explosive limit (LEL)'' means the minimum concentration of vaporin air below which propagation of a flame does not occur in the presenceof an ignition source. (See Appendix A.)``Marine Chemist'' means the holder of a valid Marine Chemist certificateissued by the National Fire Protection Association.``Not Safe for Hot Work'' means that no hot work may be performed in compartmentsor spaces so designated.``Not Safe for Workers'' means that the compartment or space so designatedcontains less than 19.5 percent oxygen by volume; or that toxic contaminantsin the atmosphere are above permissible exposure limits (PEL's) found inPart 1910, Subpart Z of this title for the period of time workers willbe exposed; or that residues are capable of producing toxic concentrationsabove the PEL's under existing atmospheric conditions; or that the concentrationof flammable vapors or gases is at or above 10 percent of the lower explosivelimit (LEL).``Oxygen-deficient atmosphere'' means an atmosphere having an oxygen concentrationof less than 19.5 percent by volume.``Oxygen-enriched atmosphere'' means an atmosphere which contains morethan 22.0 percent oxygen by volume.``Safe for Hot Work'' means that the compartment or space so designatedhas an oxygen content that does not exceed 22.0 percent by volume; andthat the concentration of flammable materials in the atmosphere is below10 percent of the lower explosive limit; and that the residues are notcapable of producing a higher concentration of flammable vapors than permittedunder existing atmospheric conditions in the presence of hot work and whilemaintained as directed; and that all adjacent spaces have been cleanedsufficiently to prevent the spread of fire, or are satisfactorily inerted.``Safe for Workers'' means that the compartment or space so designatedhas an atmosphere containing at least 19.5 percent oxygen by volume; toxiccontaminants in the atmospheres are below the PEL's; the residues in thespace are not capable of producing toxic concentrations above the PEL'sunder existing atmospheric conditions; and the concentration of flammablevapors or gases is below 10 percent of the lower explosive limit (LEL)except as provided by 29 CFR 1915.13(b)(8) for cold work operations.``Upper explosive limit'' (UEL) means the maximum concentration of flammablevapor in air above which propagation of flame does not occur on contactwith a source of ignition. (See Appendix A.)``Vessel section'' means a sub-assembly, module, or other component ofa vessel being built, repaired or broken.``Weather deck'' means the uppermost continuous deck, exclusive of theforecastle, bridge, or poop, that is exposed to the weather.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1915.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Precautions before entering compartments or spaces.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Oxygen deficient atmospheres. </T3>(1) On vessels and sections of vessels,the atmosphere in the following spaces shall be tested prior to initialentry to determine the oxygen content within the compartment or space:(i) Compartments which have been sealed, such as, but not limited to, spaceswhich have been coated and closed up, and non-ventilated compartments whichhave been freshly painted.(ii) Cargo spaces or other spaces that contain or have contained combustibleor flammable liquids and gases in bulk.(iii) Spaces adjacent to cargo spaces or other spaces that contain or havecontained combustible or flammable liquids and gases in bulk.(iv) Cargo spaces or other spaces containing or having last contained bulkliquids, gases, or solids that are toxic, corrosive, or irritant.(v) Spaces adjacent to cargo spaces or other spaces containing or havinglast contained bulk liquids, gases, or solids that are toxic, corrosive,or irritant.(vi) Spaces which have been fumigated.(vii) Spaces adjacent to spaces which have been fumigated.(viii) Cargo spaces containing cargoes or residues of cargoes which absorboxygen, such as scrap iron, fresh fruit, molasses, or various vegetabledrying oils in bulk.(2) The test required by paragraph (a)(1) of this section shall be conductedby a competent person.(3) The test required by paragraph (a)(1) of this section shall be conductedprior to employees' initial entry into the space.(4) Employees entering a space where the oxygen content is below 19.5 percentby volume shall wear a respirator in accordance with Subpart I of thispart. (See Appendix A for information on safe oxygen levels.)(5) If the space to be entered contains an atmosphere with less than 19.5percent oxygen by volume, the space shall be labeled ``Not Safe for Workers.''  (b) <T3>Flammable atmospheres. </T3>(1) On vessels and vessel sections, theatmosphere within cargo spaces or other spaces that contain or have containedcombustible or flammable liquids or cases in bulk, and spaces adjacentto those cargo spaces or other spaces, shall be tested prior to entry todetermine the concentration of flammable vapors and gases within the compartment.  (2) The test required by paragraph (b)(1) of this section shall be conductedby a competent person.  (3) The test required by paragraph (b)(1) of this section shall be conductedprior to employees' initial entry into the spaces.  (4) Employees shall not enter spaces where the concentration of flammablevapors or gases is at or above 10 percent of the lower explosive limit(LEL), except as provided in andSection;andSection;1915.12(d) and 1915.13(b)(8).(See Appendix A for precautions that should be taken when flammable vaporsor gases are below 10 percent of the LEL.)  (5) If the concentration of flammable vapors or gases in the space to beentered is at or above 10 percent of the LEL, the space shall be labeled``Not Safe for Workers,'' unless the provisions andSection;1915.12(d) orandSection;1915.13(b)(8) apply.  (6) When the atmosphere in the space to be entered is found to containa flammable substance which also has a permissible exposure limit as foundin Part 1910 of Subpart Z, the requirements of andSection;1915.12(c) shallalso apply.  (c) <T3>Toxic atmospheres and residues. </T3>(1) On vessels and vessel sections,the atmosphere and space within cargo spaces or other spaces containingor having last contained bulk liquids, gases, or solids that are toxic,corrosive or irritant; spaces which have been fumigated; and spaces adjacentto the above-named spaces shall be:  (i) Tested prior to entry to determine the concentration of toxic atmosphericcontaminants within the compartment.  (ii) Visually inspected prior to entry for the presence of toxic, or corrosiveresidues.  (2) The tests and the visual inspections required by paragraph (c)(1) ofthis section shall be conducted by a Marine Chemist, a Certified IndustrialHygienist, or a Coast Guard authorized person.  (3) The tests and visual inspection required by paragraph (c)(1) of thissection shall be conducted prior to employees' inital entry into the space. (4) When the tests and/or the visual inspections indicate that the atmosphereor the residues in the space to be entered contain a concentration of contaminantsabove the level which is immediately dangerous to life or health, the spaceshall be ventilated before entering to reduce the concentration below thelevel immediately dangerous to life and health, except as provided in paragraph(d) of this section.  (5) When the atmosphere or the residues in the space to be entered arefound to contain a concentration of toxic contaminants below the levelimmediately dangerous to life or health but above the permissible exposurelimit of Part 1910, Subpart Z, employees shall be protected in accordancewith the requirements of 29 CFR Part 1915, Subpart I of this part.  (6) When the atmosphere or the residues in the space to be entered arefound to contain or produce a concentration above the permissible exposurelimits, the space shall be labeled ``Not Safe for Workers.''  (d) <T3>Work of brief duration. </T3>In emergencies and in cases of work ofbrief duration necessary to accomplish the ventilation required or to startoperations, work may be performed on vessels or vessel sections in atmospherescontaining flammable contaminants which are above the upper explosive limitor otherwise immediately dangerous to life or health provided:  (1) No ignition sources are present; and  (2) The atmosphere in the space is maintained above the upper explosivelimit; and  (3) The atmosphere in the space is monitored continuously.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Respiratory protection and other appropriate personal protectiveequipment and clothing must be provided in accordance with Subpart I ofthis part. Other provisions for work in IDLH atmospheres are also locatedin Subpart I of this part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection;1915.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cleaning and other cold work.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Locations covered by this section. </T3>Employees shall not performmanual cleaning and other cold work on vessels and vessel sections in thefollowing locations unless the conditions of paragraph (b) of this sectionhave been met: (1) Spaces containing or having last contained combustibleor flammable liquids or gases in bulk;  (2) Spaces containing or having last contained bulk liquids, gases or solidsthat are toxic, corrosive or irritating;  (3) Spaces which have been fumigated; and  (4) Spaces adjacent to the above named spaces.  (b) <T3>Conditions for cold work. </T3>(1) Liquid residues of flammable, combustible,and toxic materials shall be removed from the spaces as thoroughly as practicablebefore employees start cold work in these spaces.  (2) If a flammable or combustible material was contained in the space,a test to determine the concentration of flammable vapors shall be madeprior to starting cold work.   (3) The test to determine the concentration of flammable vapors in theatmosphere shall be done by a competent person.(4) Tests to determine the concentration of flammable vapors shall be conductedfrequently during cold work in accordance with temperature, volatilityof the residues and other existing conditions in and about the spaces.(See Appendix A for additional information on frequency of testing.)  (5) Hot work shall only be permitted as in andSection;1915.14.    (6) Spills of flammable, combustible and toxic materials shall be cleanedup as the work progresses.   (7) The concentration of flammable vapors shall be kept lower than 10 percentof the lower explosive limit except as provided in andSection;1915.12(d)of this part and paragraph (b)(8) of this section.   (8) When highly volatile residues are such that a uniform concentrationlower than 10 percent of the lower explosive limit cannot be maintained,then sufficient ventilation shall be provided to keep the concentrationof flammable vapors below 10 percent of the lower explosive limit in themajor portions of the compartment.   (9) The competent person shall test to determine if exhaust vapors fromcompartments being ventilated are accumulating in or around the vessel.  (10) When tests required in paragraph (b)(9) of this section indicate thatflammable exhaust vapors are accumulating, sources of ignition shall beprohibited in the area of accumulation.   (11) Only lamps which meet the requirements of andSection;1910.307 of thistitle shall be used in spaces, on pipelines, on heating coils, on pumps,on fittings or on other accessories that have contained flammable or combustibleliquids or gases.(12) Signs prohibiting smoking and the use of open flames shall be postedon the open deck adjacent to those spaces which have been used to carryflammable or combustible liquids or gases in bulk, adjacent spaces, andpipelines, heating coils, pumps, fittings, or other accessories connectedto such tanks.(13) The metallic parts of air moving devices, including fans, blowers,jet air movers, and all duct work shall be electrically bonded to the vessel'sstructure.(14) Fans shall have non-sparking blades.(15) Portable air ducts shall be of non-sparking materials.(16) All motors and control equipment shall meet the requirements of andSection;1910.307 of this title.(17) All motors and associated control equipment shall be properly maintainedand grounded.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Employees shall be protected from exposure to toxic andhazardous substances during cold work in accordance with andSection; 1915.12(c)of this part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1915.14</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Hot work.</ITAG>(See Appendix A for additional information relevant to performing hot worksafely.)(a) <T3>Marine chemist's inspection required. </T3>(1) Hot work shall not bepermitted in or on the following spaces, boundaries or pipelines untiltested and certified as ``Safe for Hot Work'' by a Marine Chemist or aU.S. Coast Guard authorized person.(i) On tank vessels:(A) Within or on the boundaries of cargo tanks which contain or have containedcombustibles or flammable liquids and gases in bulk, or within spaces adjacentto such cargo tanks;(B) Within or on the boundaries of fuel tanks which contain or have lastcontained fuel; and(C) On pipelines, heating coils, pump fittings or other accessories connectedto such cargo or fuel tanks.(ii) On dry cargo, miscellaneous and passenger vessels:(A) Within or on the boundaries of cargo tanks which contain or have containedcombustible or flammable liquids and gases in bulk;(B) Within spaces adjacent to cargo tanks which contain or have containedflammable gases, or liquids with a flash point below 150anddegrees; F., exceptwhere the distance between such cargo tanks and the work to be performedis greater than 25 feet;(C) Within or on the boundaries of fuel tanks which contain or have lastcontained fuel; and(D) On pipelines, heating coils, pumps, fittings or other accessories connectedto such cargo or fuel tanks.(2) Hot work within or on the vessel spaces listed in paragraphs (a)(1)(i)and (a)(1)(ii) of this section shall not be permitted unless:(i) The oxygen content of the atmosphere is less than 22.0 percent by volume.(See Appendix A for more information about oxygen enriched atmospheres.);(ii) The concentration of flammable materials in the atmosphere is below10 percent of the lower explosive limit;(iii) The residues are not capable of producing a concentration of airborneflammable vapors at, or above, 10 percent of the lower explosive limitunder existing atmospheric conditions in the presence of hot work, andwhile maintained as directed by the Marine Chemist's or the Coast Guardauthorized person; and(iv) All adjacent spaces have been cleaned sufficiently to prevent thespread of fire, or have been inerted.(3) If any of the conditions in paragraph (a)(2) of this section do notexist, then the space shall be labeled ``Not Safe for Hot Work.''(b) <T3>Competent person inspection required.</T3> (1) Hot work shall not bepermitted on vessels or vessel sections in or on the following spaces oradjacent spaces until the requirements of paragraphs (b)(2), (b)(3) and(b)(4) of this section have been met:(i) Dry cargo holds for which a Marine Chemist's or Coast Guard authorizedperson's certificate is not required.(ii) The bilges.(iii) The engine room and boiler spaces where a Marine Chemist's or a CoastGuard authorized person certificate is not required.(2) A test to determine the concentration of flammable vapors shall beconducted on the spaces listed in paragraph (b)(1) of this section.(3) The test required by paragraph (b)(2) of this section shall be conductedby a competent person.(4) Hot work shall not be permitted in or on the spaces in paragraph (b)(1)of this section when the concentration of flammable vapors is equal toor greater than, 10 percent of the lower explosive limit.(5) If the concentration of flammable vapors or gases is equal to or above10 percent of the LEL in the space where the hot work is to be done orin the adjacent spaces, the space shall be labeled ``Not Safe for Hot Work.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1915.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintaining conditions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Prevent hazardous substances from entering spaces. </T3>Pipelines whichmay convey hazardous substances into the spaces which are ``Safe for Workers''or ``Safe for Hot Work'' shall be disconnected, blanked off, or other positivemeans shall be used to prevent hazardous substances from entering the space.(b) <T3>Altering existing conditions. </T3>When hatches, manholes or closuresare opened, or any manipulation of valves takes place which alters existingconditions so that they no longer comply with andSection;andSection; 1915.12,1915.13 and 1915.14 of this part as applicable, work in the affected spacesor areas shall stop and not resume until the affected areas have been retestedand made safe in accordance with andSection;andSection; 1915.12, 1915.13 and1915.14 of this part as applicable.(c) <T3>Weather deck hot work. </T3>Before hot work is begun on the weatherdeck over spaces which are not required under andSection; 1915.14 of thispart to meet the conditions of ``Safe for Hot Work,'' all valves, closuresand vents to the weather deck connecting with tanks or compartments belowthat contain 10% or more of the lower explosive limit shall be closed,except for those which are vented up masts. (d) <T3>Frequent tests to maintain Marine Chemist's or Coast Guard authorizedperson's certificates. </T3>After a Marine Chemist's or Coast Guard authorizedperson's certificate has been issued, a competent person shall make frequenttests to insure that atmospheric conditions in the spaces for which thecertificate has been issued are maintained. (See Appendix A for furtherinformation on frequency.) (e) <T3>Conditions on Marine Chemist's or Coast Guard authorized person's certificatealtered. </T3>After a Marine Chemist's or a Coast Guard authorized person'scertificate has been issued, and the competent person subsequently findsthat atmospheric conditions fail to meet the requirements of andSection;andSection;1915.12, 1915.13 and 1915.14 of this part as applicable, work shall bestopped and a new Marine Chemist's or Coast Guard authorized person's certificatein accordance with andSection; 1915.14(a) shall be obtained before work isresumed. (f) <T3>Frequent tests to maintain competent person's findings. </T3>Aftera competent person has conducted the tests required in andSection;andSection;1915.12, 1915.13, and 1915.14 of this part, the competent person shallmake frequent tests to insure that atmospheric conditions are maintainedin the spaces initially determined to be safe for entry, hot work or coldwork. (See Appendix A for further information.) (g) <T3>Competent person's findings altered. </T3>After the competent personhas initially determined spaces are safe for entry, hot or cold work, andthe competent person subsequently finds that atmospheric conditions failto meet the requirements of andSection;andSection; 1915.12, 1915.13 and 1915.14of this part as applicable, work shall be stopped until the conditionsin the space comply with andSection;andSection; 1915.12, 1915.13 and 1915.14as applicable. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1915.16 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Warning signs. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Label spaces tested. </T3>All tanks, compartments, and other spacesin which the atmosphere has been tested as required by this Subpart butfails to meet the requirements of andSection;andSection; 1915.12, 1915.13,or 1915.14 as applicable, shall be clearly marked, as set forth in thosesections. (See Appendix A.) (b) <T3>Obey warnings. </T3>The employer is responsible for ensuring that allemployees understand and obey all warning signs and limitations statedon the Marine Chemist's certification and on the OSHA Form 74, ``Log ofInspections and Tests by Competent Person.'' <ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix A to Subpart B_Explosive and Other Dangerous Atmospheres</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The following Appendix to Subpart B provides supplementary informationto employers and employees to assist them in understanding and complyingwith the requirements of Subpart B. The Appendix is non-mandatory. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Sections 1915.11-1915.18. </T3>These standards are minimum safety standardsfor entering and working safely in vessel tanks and compartments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 1915.11(b) ``Hot work.'' </T3>There are several instances inwhich circumstances do not necessitate that grinding, drilling, and sandor shot blasting be regarded as hot work. Some examples are: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Abrasive blasting of the hull for paint preparation does not necessitatepumping and cleaning the tanks of a tanker vessel. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Prior to hot work on many hollow structures, the void space isdrilled into to allow a test for an explosive atmosphere. A coolant canbe used on the drill bit during drilling. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 1915.11(b) ``Lower explosive limit.'' </T3>The terms lowerflammable limit (LFL) and lower explosive limit (LEL) are used interchangeablyin fire science literature. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 1915.11(b) ``Upper explosive limit.'' </T3>The terms upperflammable limit (UFL) and upper explosive limit (UEL) are used interchangeablyin fire science literature. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 1915.12(a)(4). </T3>After a tank has been properly washed andventilated, the tank ought to contain 20.8 percent oxygen by volume. Thisis the same amount found in our normal atmosphere at sea level. However,it is possible that the oxygen content will be lower. When this is thecase, the reasons for this deficiency should be determined and correctiveaction taken. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">An oxygen content of 19.5 percent can support life and is adequatefor entry. However, any oxygen level less than 20.8 percent and greaterthan 19.5 percent level should also alert the competent person to lookfor the causes of the oxygen deficiency and to correct them prior to entry.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 1915.12(b)(4) Flammable atmospheres. </T3>Atmospheres witha concentration of flammable vapors at or above 10 percent of the lowerexplosive limit (LEL) are considered hazardous when located in confinedspaces. However, atmospheres with flammable vapors below 10 percent ofthe LEL are not necessarily safe. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Such atmospheres are too lean to burn. Nevertheless, when a spacecontains or produces measurable flammable vapors below the 10 percent LEL,it might indicate that flammable vapors are being released or introducedinto the space and could present a hazard in time. Therefore, the causeof the vapors should be investigated and, if possible, eliminated priorto entry. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Some situations that have produced measurable concentrations of flammablevapors that could exceed 10 percent of the LEL in time are: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Pipelines that should have been blanked or disconnected have opened,allowing product into the space. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The vessel may have shifted, allowing product not previously cleanedand removed during washing to move into other areas of the vessel. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Residues may be producing the atmosphere by releasing flammablevapor. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 1915.12(b)(6) Flammable atmospheres which are toxic. </T3>Inaddition, an atmosphere with a measurable concentration of a flammablesubstance below 10 percent of the LEL may be above the permissible exposurelimit for that substance. Refer to andSection; 1915.12(c) (4) and (5) ifthat is the case. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 1915.13(b)(4), andSection; 1915.15(d) and andSection; 1915.15(f).</T3>The frequency with which a tank is monitored to determine if atmosphericconditions are being maintained should be a function of several factorsthat are discussed below: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Temperature. </T3>Higher temperatures will cause a combustible or flammableliquid to vaporize at a faster rate than lower temperatures. This is importantsince hotter days may cause tank residues to produce more vapors and thatmay result in the vapors exceeding 10 percent of the LEL or an overexposureto toxic contaminants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Work in the tank</T3>. Any activity in the tank could change the atmosphericconditions in that tank. Oxygen from a leaking oxyfuel hose or torch couldresult in an oxygen enriched atmosphere that would more easily propagatea flame. Some welding operations use inert gas, and leaks can result inan oxygen deficient atmosphere. Manual tank cleaning with high pressurespray devices can stir up residues and result in exposures to toxic contaminants.Simple cleaning or mucking out, where employees walk through and shovelresidues and sludge, can create a change in atmospheric conditions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Period of time elapsed</T3>. If a period of time has elapsed sincea Marine Chemist or Coast Guard authorized person has certified a tankas safe, the atmospheric condition should be rechecked by the competentperson prior to entry and starting work.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Unattended tanks</T3>. When a tank has been tested and declared safe,then subsequently left unattended for a period of time, it should be retestedprior to entry and starting work. For example, when barges are left unattendedat night, unidentified products from another barge are sometimes dumpedinto their empty tanks. Since this would result in a changed atmosphere,the tanks should be retested prior to entry and starting work.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. <T3>Work break</T3>. When workers take a break or leave at the end of theshift, equipment sometimes is inadvertently left in the tanks. At lunchor work breaks and at the end of the shift are the times when it is mostlikely someone will leave a burning or cutting torch in the tank, perhapsturned on and leaking oxygen or an inert gas. Since the former can producean oxygen enriched atmosphere, and the latter an oxygen deficient atmosphere,tanks should be checked for equipment left behind, and atmospheres monitoredif necessary prior to entering and starting work. In an oxygen enrichedatmosphere, the flammable range is severely broadened. This means thatan oxygen enriched atmosphere can promote very rapid burning.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. <T3>Ballasting or trimming</T3>. Changing the position of the ballast,or trimming, or in any way moving the vessel so as to expose cargo thathad been previously trapped, can produce a change in the atmosphere ofthe tank. The atmosphere should be retested after any such move and priorto entry or work.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 1915.14 (a) and (b) Hot work</T3>. This is a reminder thatother sections of the OSHA shipyard safety and health standards in Part1915 should be reviewed prior to starting any hot work. Most notably, SubpartD, Welding, Cutting and Heating, places additional restrictions on hotwork: The requirements of andSection;andSection; 1915.51 and 1915.53 must bemet before hot work is begun on any metal that is toxic or is covered bya preservative coating respectively; the requirements of andSection; 1915.54must be met before welding, cutting or heating is begun on any structuralvoids.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 1915.14(a)(2)(i)</T3>. During hot work, more than 20.8 percentoxygen by volume can be unsafe since it expands the normal flammable range.The standard permits the oxygen level to reach 22 percent by volume inorder to account for instrument error. However, the cause of excess oxygenshould be investigated and the source removed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 1915.16(a)</T3>. If the entire vessel has been found to bein the same condition, then employers shall be considered to be in compliancewith this requirement when signs using appropriate warning language inaccordance with andSection; 1915.16(a) are posted at the gangway and at allother means of access to the vessel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix B to Subpart B_Explosive and Other Dangerous Atmospheresin Vessels and Vessel Sections</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Appendix B provides a reprint of the Code of Federal Regulations'paragraphs referenced in Subpart B.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) 46 CFR 35.01-1(c)(1) covering tank vessels reads as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In ports or places in the United States or its territories and possessions,the inspection shall be made by a marine chemist certificated by the NationalFire Protection Association; however, if the services of such certifiedmarine chemist are not reasonably available, the Officer in Charge, MarineInspection, upon the recommendation of the vessel owner and his contractoror their representative, shall select a person who, in the case of an individualvessel, shall be authorized to make such inspection. If the inspectionindicates that such operations can be undertaken with safety, a certificatesetting forth the fact in writing and qualified as may be required, shallbe issued by the certified marine chemist or the authorized person beforethe work is started. Such qualifications shall include any requirementsas may be deemed necessary to maintain, insofar as can reasonably be done,the safe conditions in the spaces certified, throughout the operation andshall include such additional tests and certifications as considered required.Such qualifications and requirements shall include precautions necessaryto eliminate or minimize hazards that may be present from protective coatingsor residues from cargoes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) 46 CFR 71.60-1(c)(1) covering passenger vessels reads as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In ports or places in the United States or its territories and possessionsthe inspection shall be made by a marine chemist certificated by the NationalFire Protection Association; however, if the services of such certifiedmarine chemist are not reasonably available, the Officer in Charge, MarineInspection, upon the recommendation of the vessel owner and his contractoror their representative, shall select a person who, in the case of an individualvessel, shall be authorized to make such inspection. If the inspectionindicated that such operations can be undertaken with safety, a certificatesetting forth the fact in writing and qualified as may be required, shallbe issued by the certified marine chemist or the authorized person beforethe work is started. Such qualifications shall include any requirementsas may be deemed necessary to maintain, insofar as can reasonably be done,the safe conditions in the spaces certified throughout the operation andshall include such additional tests and certifications as considered required.Such qualifications and requirements shall include precautions necessaryto eliminate or minimize hazards that may be present from protective coatingsor residues from cargoes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) 46 CFR 91.50-1(c)(1) covering cargo and miscellaneous vesselsas follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In ports or places in the United States or its territories and possessionsthe inspection shall be made by a Marine Chemist certificated by the NationalFire Protection Association; however, if the services of such certifiedmarine chemist are not reasonably available, the Officer in Charge, MarineInspection, upon the recommendation of the vessel owner and his contractoror their representative, shall select a person who, in the case of an individualvessel, shall be authorized to make such inspection. If the inspectionindicated that such operations can be undertaken with safety, a certificatesetting forth the fact in writing and qualified as may be required, shallbe issued by the certified marine chemist or the authorized person beforethe work is started. Such qualifications shall include any requirementsas may be deemed necessary to maintain, insofar as can reasonably be done,the safe conditions in the spaces certified throughout the operation andshall include such additional tests and certifications as considered required.Such qualifications and requirements shall include precautions necessaryto eliminate or minimize hazards that may be present from protective coatingsor residues from cargoes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-27004 Filed 11-28-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>